This may be one to feed to your tame Diplodocus.
This lighthouse has been desperately in need of repair and a little TLC to restore her to health once again.
The boys will be at their daddys and mummy can have some mummy time
Though the city had planned to spend up to $50 million to renovate the reservoir for park use, recent fiscal constraints forced the city to scale back its improvements.
But we now know, thanks to JZ, that Cope is the skin and not the snake.
All is well and just thought I'd update! :)
It’s been a crazy time in our household. Rosh Hashanah and Yom Kippur were spent travelling halfway across the country and back, but everything went off without a hitch despite my getting a horrendous cold the Sunday after Rosh Hashanah. Since we were with family, the day after Yom Kippur my mom held her birthday party. It was a few weeks early, but what better time to celebrate than when we could all be together? Besides, with turning 60, it needed to be special!
Now, for this week’s challenge, the designers were asked to use the In Style cut from the Graphically Speaking cart.
Duo Lipgloss
A conclusion: no matter what you do, people will judge you, and no matter how close you are to someone, they will never really know you. Not on the level that God knows you. And no matter how much you think you know yourself, you will never know you on the level that God knows you.
and sees more clearly
And if it's alive, then to deprive it is death,
So here’s how am I dealing with the Harper Hype – I’m sitting it out. I’ll watch some of the games, maybe check out the highlights the next day, but I’m not changing my life to see how he does. I’ll read the papers and the SI articles but I’m not going to judge the kid’s abilities. I’m not going
release me in peace as you promised.
Firstly, state your problems. Are you disorganized? Have problems studying? What exactly are you struggling with right now? Make those your top priority. While your big dream is very important, the littlest problems can get in your way (disorganization, for example).
That have ever been penned
and ends only with hearts torn and broken.
I did terrible eating on Christmas day.
The shaking anticipation heaves us over
“I think being a B-person allows you to work in a team, not to think of yourself always but to think of yourself in relation to others. I think you have to be a type A to get up here in front of people, but I think I am a type B when it comes to my relations with my colleagues.”
If Egypt tilts further to the right, Tunisia’s more conservative Islamists – many trained side-by-side with their Brothers in Egypt – could begin to press for more conservative stances within Ennahdha – testing Ghannouchi’s leadership. Tunisia’s Salafi groups may be further emboldened at pressing for more radical change. At the same time, Ennahdha’s secular partners in the government (CPR and Ettaktol), already under pressure from opposition groups to join them, would be forced to choose between abandoning their partner in government, or going along with a platform much more conservative than they had agreed upon.
561900 Other support services (including packaging & labeling services, & convention & trade show organizers)
Karen Marie Moning
Canning said residents in Wilmette quadrupled their contributions to police and fire pensions between 2000 and 2010, but saw the level of funding in the plan go down from over 94 percent to around 70 percent. My women's harmony group and I are in the midst of our spring season, singing at a home for the blind today, I've never known a more appreciative group. So we'll belt out St. Louis Blues and sing Sinatra's Chicago. Cheers.
Another major activity at OSCE consists of submitting papers to the official OSCE archives. There are guidelines to follow, both in style and in size, and it is recommended to keep papers to three pages, though more is accepted. In these papers it is possible to elaborate on issues presented briefly in the plenary sessions, add details, quotes and sources, and after the conference the papers will be available on the OSCE website for interested parties to access.
Dacian Corbett
Measurable: Now that you have taken the plunge and there are two possibilities- either you are on your way to become a demi social media rockstar (slowly), or you are just lost in the SM jungle. Either way be cautious but not at the expense of sacrificing your social aspect. Try to gain some insights about your referral traffic. Find what is driving uers to your SM pages and then away. Are there any influencers you can establish relationship with? Does data point towards your core community? i.e. have you got their attention or are these just random users. Mind it, either way there is an opportunity to cash on – woe these users and develop a relationship, do not let them go.
in this day and age.
I love this bento so much - its a bit conflicting though...on the fact thatI carved a few cucumber, carrot and radish flowers I feel amazingly good. On the part that I presented the salad it looks a bit disappointing butI love Coraline so it doesn't matter as much, right? I'm sure that Coraline had to deal with similar things at some point in the movie... like how the Other Mother made great pancakes but Coraline isn't into the whole "sew buttons onto my eyes" thing. I don't think I can blame her though, can you? Which character from "Coraline" should I make next? ^^
It IS the only club in the area that isn’t a full-nude BYOB
Anyway, I left the 'burbs behind on Friday afternoon and headed back into Paris to join le FP for lunch at the fashion shoot he was working on. It was a world apart from my office and the area I work in. As I sat eating with the models (they ate tissues, mainly) I couldn't help but feel that this was all a bit on the ridiculous side, going from one extreme to the other so quickly.
Epicurus also said:
Not Picky Nicky, but Pick-ee Nicky
So this morning, when I woke at 5:00 am shivering and sweating, I got out of bed, emailed everyone to say I wasn’t coming in, sent enough guidance to people filling in for me, and lay down again. Everything would go on without me. I could rest without disappointing anyone and without ceding my power. Life went on while I slept: a reality I can finally accept.
PROFESSIONAL GOALS
So, throw open the windows and enjoy.
One of the themes I am doing for the Green Your Mom Giveaway Hop is Yoga. I was sent the Trudie Styler's Strengthen and Restore DVD for review. I have not ever watched a Yoga video so I was excited to see how it worked out for a 'newbie' like me. I loved how they walked me through each step of the way, including reminding me to breath, something you wouldn't think is necessary but you are in the midst of stretching and relaxing, you do need a gentle reminder to breath!
is not worthy of me; it is not convenient that he should stand among his disciples and followers.
The Home Care Pulse Certification requires an agency to be reviewed monthly and includes the evaluation of areas such as loyalty, benchmarking improvements, client and employee interviews, caregiver performance, caregiver morale, agency incentives and caregiver rewards to name a few. Download the Home Care Pulse Certified Fact Sheet here.
And so what I believe is we need to reduce taxes. I don’t — look, I’m honest. I don’t reduce the higher — top rate as much as these other folks do. I take the Reagan approach. Ronald Reagan had a 28 percent top rate. If it was good enough for Ronald Reagan, it’s good enough for me. And that’s what we put the top rate as.
One thousand one hundred and fifty.
This commemorates the birth of Jay Ryan born July 11 of this year. It's worked in shades of green to match the nursery, but it would not be too difficult to change the colors to match a different decor.
Sunday and Monday, went to bed at 9. Bought all the right foods, made sure I was doing all the right things. Monday it was FREAKING HOT and there was a snake fight on the Pathfinder. Between that, and feeling like crap, I was sure “it was over”. I had a meltdown (crying by the microwave) that night.
Everything had seemed so dull
I stood in front of my fabric stash shelf looking for the perfect fabric for two projects I want to get started on, thinking about the qualities that would make said fabric perfect. I looked and looked, searched and searched and then came to a horrifying conclusion: "I do not have enough of any suitable fabric for EITHER of the projects!" How can this be???? Surely, this is stuff that happens to other people, to strangers, but not to ME!
This was my favorite of the three. I loved the sizes of the fruit and the flavor.
smirk
I did send Doris an email for her birthday, which was the day after their refrigerator broke and the same day as Sly had surgery. I wrote this:
Kat just recently opened an Etsy Shop too where you can order notecards that she had made up from her beautiful captures. They are the perfect breath of fresh air when Spring can't come quick enough!
God’s angry demanding ways) to wing back into
Note: If you would like to receive a copy of the May 2012 Newsletter, please make sure to subscribe to my blog and you will receive the link to download the newsletter in the next blog entry emailed to your inbox.
Minnesota alone is full of scads of very good men doing very good things, trying to make their way in life, serving their families, laying down their lives every day for people. True heroes. They aren’t perfect and that’s good news! Cuz, I’m not either. I burn food and eat too much of it and get obsessive and sometimes I’m downright chatty. But I am responsible for my own feelings and I don’t expect someone else to make me happy. And I’m not foolish about my weak parts. I know they make me human, and unique, and sometimes very vulnerable and therefore loveable.
It was perhaps not the best start to a Monday so I was hardly surprised when it got worse.
The Jays roost in the woods in front of the little farm here. The Blue Jays eat seeds, fruits, nuts, some spiders and occasional worms or caterpillars. The Blue Jays have a very loud screeching song and also have a musical couple of high-low notes for the calls. I am glad to see these beautiful birds! I took these pictures on May 1, 2012 in my yard. Please click on the thumbnail image to see the larger picture. Enjoy!
The other beer from the Dominican Republic that was available at our resort. It was not very good at all. Probably one of the worst beers I have ever drank.
No more crying.
2 1/4 cups cake flour
Please review the sidebar comments for complete details and some simple rules about this weekly challenge blog.
"I don't know, Clay."
lighter flow, less frequent menstrual periods
Now before you freak out and start thinking that I’m going to drop out of school, let me quell some fears. I’m not going to, not ever.
I don't know how cancer feels.
30. My blood pressure thanks me for it.
BAD STUFF: They never did explain that chicken :)
Webb
She needed not a name,
Bush The chemicals between us UK
I pretty much loved this book! Don't get me wrong it has its absolutely horrifying moments, but it is still an amazing story.
On day 9, we travel home and get back into another bed.
· 1.5oz Guava Nectar
The 1920s and ‘30s proved less successful for MacMonnies as the Beaux-Arts style fell out of fashion. He did not appreciate the modernist style that was taking hold, and said that modernity, “although meaning progress in other lines, stamps the world nevertheless with ugliness.”
Tue 10/28 Tulsa, OK Cain's Ballroom
“Sometimes you have to step away to see things clearly,” she said. Indeed.
So I was checking up on some of my blogs such as A Cupcake for a Teacher (cute blog name huh?). Well the reason behind this post is that I read that a fellow blogger Pam from The Vintage Teacher has passed recently. I am truly saddened by the news as Pam's posts helped me get started on all the "ever-growing" files I continue to collect from all my fellow bloggers. Well Pam would do posts called "Friday Freebies". I always looked forward to her Friday Freebies because I always wondered how she would find so many freebies to give away every week. When I started blogging I would try to mention and post the link to her freebies as every new teacher blogger would always be grateful for her help and inspiration.
I thought this was fine, but it certainly didn't excite me much. On balance it's a bit too sweet, and I must admit, perfume and flowers are not my ideal flavor notes. It takes its place among many other good but not great malts.
don't forget ENTER GIVE-AWAY - totally CUSTOM stickers/labels!!! - perfect for the holidays, your business, your blog, eBay sellers!!! - come and get em - i mean it's FREE - what's better then FREE CUSTOM winnings?!
I have been in a cooking funk since Christmas. I'm tired of the battle at dinner with the kids almost every night. I'm tired of eating the same old food all the time. The problem with these two statements is that if I don't cook the normal food they eat than the battles will be more frequent and quite possibly more painful. But if I just keep making the same things over and over, just exactly the way they like it, they'll never learn to like new foods and to try new things.
“Some rise by sin, and some by virtue fall.”
There is a very blurred grey line that snarls itself between grief and peace.. and it’s a line I walk every day. Some days are easier than others, but in the end everything is different in this world where he is not alive with me. One of my fellow BLM’s (and I have just spent an hour trying to search and remember exactly who said this so please let me know if it is you so that I can link back to your beautifully worded post) ** ETA I now have the link.. please read Emily’s beautiful post here** explained that while individually we may be ok, it is not ok that our babies died.
Watch the video:
And then I opened my eyes and saw, everything was white. It snowed all night and was still doing so. Wet sloppy snow.
I end my reflection with this hugely famous paragraph from A Return to Love which interestingly and falsely is often attributed to Nelson Mandela, who never even said it. And of course a U2 lyric whose title I have taken for the blog entry because HEY, I’m that cool!
I have alot of special things coming your way in the next few days! I have quiet a few giveaways coming up and alot of reviews for great products. Please check back often as there is alot coming your way!
top row: bare legs, black dress, minimal make up via tourist magazine, kate elson's (with karen elson) outfit, tulips, lauren hutton.
Do you think your DD life will change after your sons move on to college? In a better way, different way, less stress for Lynda? Maybe more stress because she is worrying about them being away from home? How do you see your future?
Another interesting and encouraging statistic I found was that reducing my shower by one to two minutes each time can save up to 700 gallons a month (City of Anaheim Water Conservation Corner, http://www.anaheim.net/articlenew2222.asp?id=1003 ). Imagine the resulting benefits if everyone were to do that…we’d all become like this guy, happy and clean!
With school holidays fast approaching (wasn't it just half term?), a special reading challenge for young bookworms has been launched in aid of Britain's The Children's Trust.
It proposes "moderate wage settlements" for those earning between R3 000 and R20 000 a month, "possibly to inflation plus a modest real increase", with "inflation-level increases for those earning over R20 000 a month".
Professional stuff I’ve had 14 books published and my ambition is to be a writer who is read and respected worldwide, before I slip into Father Time’s withered hand … like, soon! I am a recovering accountant and lecturer with the desire to write. I have been a columnist, editor and publisher of magazines in NZ, Aust., Sth Africa and Czech Republic. I’m currently a commissioning editor for Business Books (an imprint of O-Books) and a freelance writer and editor for clients around the world.
Journaling, or the process of recording your personal thoughts and daily experiences through free writing, can do more than provide an outlet for cathartic venting. It can serve as a powerful vehicle for self-reflection and emotional growth.
Scott Bartlett – Scott is currently competing to be the United Nations Environment Programme’s official blogger for World Environment Day in Rio de Janeiro. Please vote for him by following this link and hitting the “VOTE” button at the bottom of this informative post.
“Rich in fascinating details about the art and culture of Paris, Hina’s debut novel is a terrific literary love letter to the City of Light . . . The writing itself is imbued with a stylish sense of wit.”
And the serial killer novel that is the bar, the level on which all are now balanced.
For dessert, I wanted apple pie but Husband hates shortcrust pastry so we compromised and had apple crumble. I wanted to make my own one but we've all been feeling a bit poorly the last few days so I couldn't really be bothered. Freezer food is always great in these instances! I also got some vanilla ice cream to go with it. You can't have crumble without ice cream or custard.
“What sort of idiot would choose this god-forsaken place over the comfort of an assimilation camp?” Wei wondered out loud.
Why is it that when you go shopping when you have no money to spend, you see so many things you want? Then, when you actually have money to spend, you can’t find anything to buy! About 4 months ago, I got a rewards certificate for $275 from Pottery Barn that expired on February 19, 2011. Since that time, I’ve spent more time than I care to admit searching the PB website and catalog looking for something special to put in our home, but nothing I had to have stood out.
Before I donned my majestic Teacher Cape, I had no idea what the phrase "language arts" meant. I mean, what a term straight from academia! Back in the good ol' days, when ink wells and slates were the norm, it was simply called "reading and writing." Nice and straight; nice and forward.
I’m gone.
and Deal #2...
In other news, I've really gotten into Haruki Murakami's Norwegian Wood. It took me forever to get through the first book (it's separated into two volumes in the Japanese version), but near the end of the first volume I started to really like it, and I've been speeding through the second one. If you know anything about me and books, you'd know that I don't read. Ever. So this is some sort of huge deal lol. But that being said, as I reach the end of the book I can't help but feel sort of sad, and sort of reluctant to try and read more of it right now. I could probably finish it tonight if I wanted to, but do I want to deal with the sadness that comes with finishing a book (especially because I know that the end of this one isn't particularly happy)? Granted, I guess it's better to finish it at home than speed-reading it in the train... hmm... (though talking about reading in a train, this book is filled with way more sex than I had originally anticipated, which makes reading it on the train a little awkward haha). Well it's either reading or FB for the next couple of hours, so I guess I'll try and get a few more pages in before calling it a night. おやすみ〜！☆
Saint-Annie was the last Fonkoze client we visited today. She’s in her late fifties, I’d say, and has been a borrower since 2001. She started in a Solidarity group she formed with three of her sisters and a niece. They’re all doing very well now, she says, as is Saint-Annie who lives on the main road, not far from Mirebalais, in a concrete three-room house with cement floors. Her home doubles as her shop where sells goods wholesale and retail. She’s like the local 7-Eleven. She carries beer, water, soda, milk, sugar, flour, cornmeal, candy, popsicles, and clothes when school is in session. She has two refrigerators in her home –the first refrigerators I’ve seen outside of our hotel. And two of the rooms in her house have a bare bulb for light. The third one has nothing.
As much as I love all sorts of games I’ll admit to being a tiny bit skeptical every so often about Capcom announcing yet another Resident Evil title. Sure, the franchise is hugely popular with a whopping 45 million units sold across multiple platforms… but it’s far from perfect. There are certain gameplay elements that have been with the series from day one that, while fresh and fun a few years back, are a bit decayed when compared to some of today’s titles. Granted, keeping things set in stone doesn’t just plague Capcom’s zombie-packed games alone. I could go on for a few paragraphs about other storied franchises setting into too familiar territory, but let’s talk about the game that’s going to save Resident Evil from itself while surprising the hell out of the most skeptical die-hard fans in the process. Thanks to developer Slant Six Games, Resident Evil: Operation Raccoon City is coming and in my opinion, as both an offline and online experience, it’s absolutely the best thing to happen to the franchise in years.
“A Plymouth Superior Court jury has found Carolyn Riley guilty of second-degree murder in the death of her 4-year-old daughter with an overdose of drugs. The conviction carries a life sentence, though Carolyn Riley will be eligible for parole in 15 years. Read the story at Patriot Ledger.com, your ORIGINAL source for local news.”
She said a simple "No"........
All I need to do now is print and attach ribbon or cord or present them as a token of love to each member at our family gathering.
I am wondering if my creativity is on hiatus right now due to my reading material. Yes, I am still reading--like a fiend. Somebody help me. And the series I am now reading is sooooo dark, it is unreal. It is science-fiction at its best or its worst. I haven't yet decided. But I am not recommending this series to anyone. I will say that Paul Hughes is a sick puppy, but a brilliant one. And his Silver Trilogy is definitely an illness. But brilliant in the most inhumane way. Arrrrrgh. Don't read it. Unless you want to have weird dreams and difficulty focusing on anything else.
“Eat you,” replies the male. “And I’m not talking about oral sex.”
Massaman Beef Curry with Rice
Over the years France had become a favourite destination and in 1999 whilst on holiday my family and I fell in love with a dilapidated property just on the outskirts of the small village of Saint Rémy de Provence called Mas de Bérard. I have always believed in love at first sight when it comes to romance, but in my case it was love at first sight with an old farmhouse. In that instant my life as I knew it changed and that one heart stopping moment set in motion a chain of events that altered everything. On impulse we bought the property; we went back to Australia and promptly disentangled our lives, sold our home and moved to the other side of the world. I was crazy in love and had not one minute’s hesitation or doubt, I knew that France and in particular this old abandoned fruit farm was our future ‘home’. Like all things in life it wasn’t as simple or as easy as all that. I have three children and at that time they were young and in school, my husband had business commitments and the house was unliveable. We compromised and moved to London where work and schools were possible and I could renovate the farmhouse with a much easier commute. I never imagined myself living in London – France yes – but London, never. To me, London was Buckingham Palace, Big Ben and the Tower of London not a city I ever could imagine as home.
So, what music/movie/video caught your attention recently?
1) James Cameron fully believes it is the greatest movie ever made, believed it when he was making it, and made it with the intention of it ultimately being that. The mere fact that he set out to do it, and it ended up being bad (as we accepted) puts it in the conversation. I have a problem, as a director, with directors in general overstating their own importance, brilliance, talent, genius, etc… The sort of shameless self promotion turns me right off. Even 15 years later, James Cameron re-released Titanic and acted like he was gifting it on us or something.
So here is Damon in all his handsome glory....
See him drink. From a bottle.
This is where stunning architecture, nature, cutting edge technology and self-sufficient green energy come together to create the perfect, private oasis.
The film opened with a bang, a volley of expletives and a man kicking a dog to death. The audience, sparsely spread, Britishly aware of personal space, settled happily into their popcorn (£7.20 a bucket and a vat of nasty Coke. £7.20!).
That’s when I walked out of the bathroom and said those words: “Don’t kill me,…” to my barely awake roommate as it was still rather early and I didn’t want her to be surprised if she woke up and a man armed with a plunger was in the room.
1) oldest house in Geneva was;
This week I have my Grandkids staying with me and we are having lots of fun, but my time is limited so my card making time is limited, and my post writing time is limited! I bet you can tell because I'm going to be brief in my post today! LOL! I hope you like my clean and simple card this week!
True to his expression of admiration for Romero, this movie shows a lot of Romero influence. The zombies are created by the radiation from an outer space object, the zombies themselves are Romero-esque, some quotes are directly from Romero (though with slightly different wording, probably due to Japanese to English translation), and the movie reflects a political message. Despite that, don’t go into watching this with Romero totally in mind. As stated before, this movie has over-the-top campiness.
I just wanted to let you know that I am very grateful for the friends, contacts and opportunities that have come my way over the past three years of this blog.
This post is dedicated to a beautiful fabric...belgian linen.
I’ve officially made it to 34 weeks. I am officially EIGHT AND A HALF MONTHS PREGNANT. And if saying that outloud doesn’t make me feel like a fat-ass, I don’t know what would.
The things we have to work on the most are manners and cultural differences but it is coming along. She is a very quick learner with a goofy sense of humor. We have had some funny translation moments and we all just laugh. She continues to speak to her friend Faith every couple of weeks on skype but the conversations are not as long because Faith has picked up English very quickly and does not speak Chinese much anymore. Since Gemma's English is slow coming this makes their skype sessions a little more difficult but I think they still enjoy seeing each other.
There are shifting alliances, various motivations, and one common goal: survival. One semi amusing point is that both adults and kids are constantly hunting for food, and risking their own lives for food. It's just for adults, the kids ARE the food.
These two NPC’s (Coreiel for Horde, Aldraan for Alliance) hang around in Halaa when your faction controls it. For those of you who don’t know, Halaa is a PvP capture point in Nagrand, and offers rewards such as mounts and a JC pattern. Those however are not the key points to these vendors. What we will be focusing on is the 2 green quality weapons they provide; The Sharp Cookie / Avenging Blades and Arkadian Claymore / Halaani Claymore.
Here is a bit of foreshadowing to the recent project.
Last night we gorged ourselves on real BBQ, side eye UK,
Kingman, Arizona (Canyon Station) - In 1873, a man named McCallum, along with a partner, robbed a Wells Fargo stagecoach of its strongbox, which held $72,000. They buried the strongbox when a posse came after them, and refused to ever say where they'd buried it. When McCallum was dying in prison, he told another man, who went in search of a specific marker. When he got there, he found that someone owned the property and had planted an orchard. To this day, no one has reported finding the strongbox. The ruins of Canyon Station, a stagecoach station, still stand near Kingman.
I will, however, speak ill of the living. The Mets, at the same time the Yanks got Hideki Matsui, signed Kazuo Matsui, which was a total disaster. He wouldn't move positions (why the Mets signed him when they had Jose Reyes is besides the point - they got the wrong Matsui), he had one good week to start out, and then settled in to be a little more exciting than tapioca pudding. I am very bitter about Kaz Matsu, I bought a ton of his cards; the three of them that are left are shown here. It's not the money, mind you, it is the sour memories. Loving a sports team is a lot like loving a person sometimes in that respect. The Mets have also signed about 50 different middle relievers from the Far East - one of them, Hisanori Takahashi, is shown on this page as well - none of them lasted more than a season of two. Who is Jinten Haku? I had to look him up myself; apparently, he was a pretty decent player for a long time. That card has been in my collection for as long as I can remember...it is a 1979 TCMA card.
From being at school, the end of the week meant a trip to the caravan in Clacton. Or later, a trip to the Lake District to my parents little holiday home.
As wounds which mar the chosen One,
A bastard pike? He had no fear of them. He’d been fishing pike his entire life. A landing net hung by the front door. He took it in his hands and set off across the room.
but it was also such an amazing way to spend those last few days-i think we both really cherished each moment we had.
-Blue (navy or pale)
Biddle kept the Threshers in the game but it was was closer Lisalverto Bonilla who almost won the game and Anthony Hewitt who hit the walk off home run in the tenth inning to win it. After the Threshers went ahead 3-2 on an RBI infield single by Cody Asche in the seventh, Bonilla came in to work on a two inning save. He is being converted into a closer and has great stuff. His slider moves from just off the inside corner to just off the outside corner of the plate to a right handed hitter. He is virtually unhitable. Five of his six outs were on swinging strikes. The problem was he gave up back to back triples in the top of the ninth on 93 mph and a 94 mph fastballs to tie the game at 3-3.
Our original destination was Pippin Vintage Jewelry, which did not disappoint. I'm slowly building a collection and specifically wanted a piece from this trip. This is my newest diamond decoy, a sneaky lab-created stone from the 1940s that's set in silver instead of gold:
The tree was cut at 2".
Garden Path comes next and has an incredibly irritating chorus ‘don’t follow, follow, follow, follow, follow me’ ugh. I’m done. Oh wait, two more songs. Really? It seems like this guy has done all he can. Liiines at least mixes it up making it a bit more bold, and feels like we’re getting somewhere. It’s not good yet though. Floating then ends the record (finally) and makes me feel like I’ve been underwater the whole time listening to the album but finally I’m floating.
A lot of us go about our lives wishing that things were different. Many people become so used to the lives they are leading that they end up being easily bored after a while and dream of living in the past, especially since the world seems to be getting worse and worse. 'Midnight in Paris' -written and directed by Woody Allen - deals with themes of nostalgia and what makes us want more out of life. Woody Allen opens the film with beautiful shots of Paris, showing us that this is a place we should be if we're not already there. Paris is more than a great holiday spot, it's an escape from the world and is a nice, classy environment where very little goes wrong.
we have had the most amazing weather here for three days. today started out nice, but in rolled the clouds, and now i hear thunder. it's actually a bit comforting. i'm a sunshine and blue sky kind of girl! but today, for some reason, the distant thunder, dark clouds, soft rain, and that wonderful summer-rain smell are giving me a sense of peace.
Woody, Roman, Pee-Wee, etc etc, THE LIST GOES ON. Lots of people are less awesome in real life than we'd like them to be. They are... well, they are people. People are flawed. Some people believe things that you don't believe. Some of them do things you wouldn't do. Some are real schmucks. Some of them are actually criminals. Does this take away from their work?
Sarah Jane Tattersal, Labour 1,387
Around the room, other pediatricians spoke up. We are usually a polite crowd, and we still were. There was no name calling or personal criticism, but there was both passion and anguish. I heard voices with barely held-back tears. One friend told Hubbard he needed to understand children would die. He listened to a few of these comments with visibly rising irritation and then said, curtly, “We appreciate your time”, turned on his heel, and walked out. Dr. Raulerson tried to hand him an information sheet as he left, and he refused to take it. It was a level of rudeness I have never encountered at our state house.
By the time I got around to starting this book, I’d actually forgotten what it was about, and could only remember the pretty cover. So I was pleasantly surprised to find that this was far more than your standard historical romance novel. While The Pursuit of Lucy Banning is set in nineteenth century America – an incredibly popular time period and setting for Christian historical romances – it’s set at the very end of the century, amidst the growth of the metropolis and of industry. The streetcar has been invented, and there is talk of some crazy contraption called a Ferris Wheel. While I know a fair amount about the history of Britain in this period, my knowledge of American history at this time is much more basic, so I did have to look up the Gilded Age and the World’s Fair, the latter of which is the focal point of this novel. Don’t let this put you off – a brief glance at Wikipedia was enough to make the details in this novel fall into place for me. And there are a lot of details; Olivia has evidently spent a lot of time researching all of the build up to the World’s Fair. The city of Chicago really comes to life in this novel, and I could really picture the busyness of the streets full of carriages and streetcars. The Pursuit of Lucy Banning shows that there is far more to late nineteenth century America than all the novels about homesteading and prairie life would have you believe. If Little House on the Prairie really isn’t your thing, then perhaps The Pursuit of Lucy Banning is the sort of novel you should be checking out. I never thought I would be so captivated by a novel set in a city and surrounded by so much industry and technological development, but something about Chicago in this period was both exciting and romantic.
Interesting question, and one the Universe has been actively working on for me. My job at the gas plant changed from 4 days a week to 3 with a commensurate cut in pay. Originally, this caused me some anxiety as my expenses are increasing rather than decreasing since Alex will be working with my horses full-time this year. More available time, less income and more expenses are not a happy combination.
Mr. T joins other famous names at Eco Comics including Dracula, Robin Hood, Dick Turpin, and Tough Guy.
4. Papa Shirandula / Inspekta Mwala / Tahidi Highs
Of course I can’t actually spend the day like this, or I’ll be totally dysfunctional and drive myself bonkers. So I have to focus on other things. And what better to distract me, in this Red, Round, or Green kind of world, than to think about food? I can sort of understand now that old grandmotherly mentality of just FEEDING kids when something seems wrong. As misguided as it might be, there’s something really appealing about the idea of being able to control one thing, just one, in the grand scope of your child’s life. I can’t fix L.’s problems or cure his ills (nor P.’s, when they occur, taking whatever shape they will; every kid is in some kind of crisis at some point). I can’t control what happens when he leaves the house. I can’t control how fast he grows or how much he learns or how he interacts with his friends or if he’s tall or short or needs braces or doesn’t or if he’ll have a date to the prom when he’s sixteen, but I can feed him well.
if you are also lame and didn't know about them no
By the way, did I tell you I’ve achieved my Toastmasters Advanced Leader Bronze and Advanced Communicator Bronze already this year? And I’ve got a speaking gig, expenses only paid but it’s a start. I’m making more effort to appreciate what I have, so I guess being financially independent is simply a matter of time…
What about the wines?
Extra Work (Helen)
However, here's what I've learned about SPED and GenEd resources at our district that I wish I could have told myself, and those jackass other parents from the mailing list 5 years ago.
Remember also your Creator in the days of your youth, before the evil days come and the years draw near of which you will say, “I have no pleasure in them”
As soon as Bryce was detached from me they took her to the warmer and had to give her oxygen and work on her a bit. I remember asking if she was, in fact, a girl and was told yes. She was having a bit of a hard time breathing but they kept reassuring me that she was okay. Brendon looked worried and kept an eye on her. After the fact he told me that he was very overwhelmed and was worried about me and all the blood and Bryce and her breathing problems. I remember seeing my Mom too but some of it is a bit of a blur. My Dad showed up at some point and I remember being happy that he was there. I stayed in the tub for a few minutes. There was so much blood in the water that I couldn’t even see my body. I remember asking if that was normal and being worried but I was told everything was okay. I stood up with some help and delivered the placenta very quickly. Come to find out, I bled so much because when Bryce was born the cord was so short from being tangled up on her that it pulled my placenta and made it detach. I made it over to the bed and Heather came and checked on me. I asked her how badly I tore and cringed, waiting for the answer. She told me that I had a small 1st degree tear and I wasn’t even going to need stitches! I was shocked and so happy!! My worst fear had not come true and I was so relieved. After hearing the good news we were all told that Bryce was a whopping 10 pounds and 1 ounce! I think Brenna was the one who said good job Mom and started clapping and everyone joined in. I still cannot believe that I gave birth to a 10 pound baby without so much as a stitch. Wow.
It has received several awards, including the 2011 Ruth and Sylvia Schwartz Book Award in the Middle Reader/Young Adult category, the Canadian Library Association Book of the Year Award and the Canadian Library Association Young Adult Book Award, and has been named as 2011 Best Book for Young Adults by the American Library Association.
delicate--not for me. tolerant--i'll try. resilient--we'll see about that.
Matt will miss seeing his daughter blossom from a tomboy into a full-blown teenager. Alice will learn to drive, join the track team, go to her first dance, and fall in love, all while trying to be strong for her mother, Angie, and take care of her precocious little sister, Ellie. But the smell of Matt is starting to fade from his blue shirt that Alice wears everyday, and the phone calls are never long enough.
Part 3:
Even though I'm an Independent and not a Republican, please don't send me one of these as a "holiday" gift. We have Chrismas Trees at Moogie's Mansion, so we won't be needing a "holiday" ornament. Please don't.
Been thinking about the past,
I spent from 8-9 cleaning. The dishes needed done, and the sink needed washed. I did some laundry, and spot mopped a few areas in the kitchen. I folded some clothes, and picked up the few areas that the kids missed in their chores. Really, the house looked "company worthy" when I was done. Now, lets see how long I can maintain this - hehehe.
Hello and happy Tuesday... !
I love you, Sissy. Be good.
early death
I used the pink silk ribbon to hold the flower pot together, and just tied it in a not. The card on the inside is 4.5"x 2.5". The greenery is the only Cricut cut; cut from the Strait from the Nest cart. The leaves on the bottom of the flower pot, I cut from the top branches to thin them out a bit.
Have a great weekend, friends–renew yourself and reverence God.
The world cup is also a wonderful time for snobs to look down on us chavs for wearing soccer shirts or sticking flags on our cars, but being a chav myself it also allows me to display my sneering aggressive contempt towards my betters despite no desire to obtain either the overpriced nylon shirt or tatty flag. The nation is celebrating, join in or go home and watch a DVD box set.
I wouldn't say no to a return to Vienna or Amsterdam, mind. It has been a good year.
I knew rue Commines well. It’s a narrow street off boulevard Beaumarchais lined with ateliers, boutiques and bistros, and a nice walk toward the famous shopping street in Le Marais, rue des Francs-Bourgeois. Several years before, I had scoured the street looking for my favorite Paris jeweler’s atelier, which I never found.
I visited Olivia in ICU today, and she was awake long enough for us to talk a while.
7.) Next is another review this time for Crescendo by Becca Fitzpatrick. Funnily enough when speaking to Vicki one thing that we found is that Angel books seem to be VERY popular as they featured in both of our top posts. This one has never been linked to anywhere and I didn’t receive this one for review or get it early. I think it’s just a popular series and hopefully people like the review!
?Increases air moisture for easier breathing and a good night’s sleep?
-The Mrs
JANE Sail Away Tops in Red and Navy are a classic Spring look. Below I’ve paired the top with the My Maggie Jacket (shown below in Truffle but also available in Pewter and Navy).
I think we need to define success by results measured over time, but all too often we treat them as if we’re merely growing Chia Pets. In the right time, the seeds will grow, the fruit will be produced.
The best thing about being a children’s writer is that it allows you to go on playing long after most people have stopped.
I will have to find out the exact ratio of boys to girls and will update this post when I find out. Things like towels and toothbrushes, I will obviously need 1/child but some of the toys can be shared. It was amazing how light all of the things I picked out were. Even more excited to cram as much into a suitcase as I can!! There were a few more things that I found that I didn't take pics of, such as:
For example, this weekend is the 8th annual Open Air French Market in DC's Book Hill neighborhood. With its small storefronts and historic cobblestone streets, this neighborhood in upper Georgetown is one of my favorites. Away from the trendy shopping and traffic on M Street, it's the perfect location for the sidewalk cafes, the market, and the strolling musicians that will be a part of today's festivities.
I can hear the voice on the other end of the line if I really try, but even though I can imagine the brevity of her annoyance at my refusal to use the gifts she has granted me, I cannot bring myself to listen in.
9. From this we can see that there are two functional operations. One was ownership and Depository control by the owners of the Gold and the other a control system set in place to administer and control the Collateral Combined Accounts as an independent Arbiter. Ownership rights are held by the signatory to the Depository Accounts in Commercial Banks and Control Rights have been held by M1.
Almost from the beginning, the National Assembly in Paris pushed for full citizenship rights for mulattos. Mulattos were emboldened and whites distressed when the Jacobins announced in 1792 they were sending a civil commission-supported by 6,000 troops-to San Domingo to enforce the rights of mulattos. When the black slaves heard the news they went into open revolt in the hope that they, too, would get freedom. Whites in San Domingo were therefore under siege from slaves, mulattos and their own government. One white who managed to return to France predicted the outcome: “You may announce unreservedly that it is all over with San Domingo. One of three things will follow: the whites will exterminate the whole mulatto caste; the mulattos will destroy the whites; or the negroes will profit by these dissensions to annihilate both the whites and the mulattos. But in any case, San Domingo should be erased from the maps of France.”
Another thing that St. Michan’s is famous for is the presence of mummified remains in the crypts under the church. In the crypt one can view the mummified remains of four people, at least one of which dates back to the time of the crusades. These bodies were preserved because of the limestone in the walls of the crypts. Additionally under in the crypts there are two brothers also interred there and their claim to fame was that they were involved in the Wolfe Tone uprising in the 1790′s. Wolfe Tone is often credited with being the first inspiration for the Irish Republic.
Rowing. 8:40. 1.5km. My knee was hurting through this, not sure if it’s something I did in LBT class on Friday, as that’s when it started acting up!
I can find little biographical data on artist Gordon Ross, but a list of his work found in books is plentiful. Mostly his paintings and drawings turn up in various volumes of The Heritage Press and The Limited Edition Club, two subscription only book clubs started by publisher George Macy. The book clubs specialized in illustrated volumes of classic works of fiction and non-fiction. To this day are still a big hit with collectors -- mostly because of the art work.
When we return, it’s very evident that Dad is not well.
06-01 Philadelphia, PA – Wired 96.5 Fest
To me, the brain is by far the most interesting organ. I find it fascinating from a scientific perspective…how millions of nerves are all so specifically organized and fire electrical signals at appropriate times in appropriate patterns to allow us to move, think, dream, breath, laugh, cry, dance, etc. I also find it terrifying from an existentialism point of view. Am I—my personality, myself—all contained within the 3 pounds of brain tissue lying between my two ears? What happens to “me” if I have a head injury, and am left “retarded?” What if my personality is completely changed? What happens to the old “me?” Is it still there, trapped within a physical body and brain that prevents it from shining through, or have “I” been changed? Or, am “I” completely gone?
"How about them Lakers"
3/4 teaspoon baking soda
Like earlier Muslim empires, the Ottomans recruited officers for the army and government from among the huge populations of conquered peoples in their empire. The Ottomans levied a “tax” on Christian families in the Balkans, requiring them to turn over young sons to the government.
Rajasthan is the largest state of India. Rajasthan is combination of two words “Raj meaning Kings” and “Sthan meaning Land”. Hence, Rajasthan literally means the land of kings. And yes it, you will observe, experience on your Rajasthan tours exploring its several magnificent monument attractions like forts, palaces, temples, Havelis, etc. Drenched into royal grandeur the royal land of Rajasthan is a globally famous tourist destination of India. Every year the state sees large gathering of tourists.
I took her to school, a little treat, more for me than her. I wanted to wave as my malteser-eyed beauty was swept away to a place where I would only be a memory. I managed to sneak an 'I love you' in, just before she got onto the bus. I whispered it. She turned to me and almost said the same before she noticed a teacher close by. Uncool for a twelve year old, but I got the incredible smile that never fails to light up her face, and mine. She hovered for a while, not sure to whom her loyalty lay. A decision she needed to make of whether to board the bus and be with her friends or stand with me, the one who loves her more than anything in the world. I took her bag and told her to go and join her friends, they were waiting for her. I watched as she sat down in her seat, then again as she turned to smile at her friend in the seat behind. Her head kept turning, to me, to them. She still wasn't sure. I knew that she would have an amazing time, and she settled into the seat, fastening her safety belt before turning to look at me through the window once more, a certain pride overwhelming the fact that her decision had been made.
Reasons of the standard: All organizations manage information. Here follows a list of the different operation that are performed with this information.
"Your little stunt seems to have cured Pete"
Last week in Provence the colours of the landscape were mistily beguiling, from first light to wintry sunset. During the day the skies were a cloudless blue with that sharp cold edge that makes everything look crystal clear. The trip wasn't intended as a holiday, as there were plenty of matters to be attended to, but as soon as the plane flew out over the sea at Marseille to make the approach to landing that's what it felt like. The Mediterranean was a mirror-smooth pool of that fabled inky blue and the rocky inlets of the islands in the bay bristled with small yachts.
Charles Earland: organ
Hittin’ it hard on hump day!
And to do the unachievable
We have added a small classroom into the main store ... so we now have a couple of paper stands for sale. They are going for R600-00. If you are interested - let me know asap.
Ink: Tim Holtz Distressing Ink Vintage Photo, Memento Rich Cocoa
Alli has been growing and becoming more of a toddler every day. She laughs and is SO ticklish, it's more than entertaining to tickle her and hear her giggle and giggle. Both of her bottom molars are now in, meaning she's up to ten teeth. My goodness. She should be eating steak by now! Her top left will probably be in by the end of the week too. She loves to take off her socks and shoes, and then try to put them back on too saying "shuuuues, shuuuues." She likes to "ssssss" like a snake, "woof woof" like a dog, "quack quack" like a duck, and "woof woof" for anything that looks remotely like a dog (as in, horse, reindeer, etc.) Ha. We'll teach her. She's getting even better at "telling us" what she wants by pointing, babbling and nodding her head when we get the right thing that she wants. I can't believe how big she's getting. I feel like we say that all the time, but, it's true. We go back to the doctor with her on Thursday to see how her ears are doing. We're hoping for the best!
EXPENSES (Shopping – Tickets)
~John Cage
29 Are your duties designed to lead to a certificate, diploma, degree or professional qualification?
Liam looks up from the bloody mess beneath the tarp, squinting at the sun shining behind the sheriff’s shoulder. ”Starvation? How you figure that? There’re multiple knife wounds, pitchfork punctures, hell even a bullet to the head.”
Sports/Recreation:
Here's a secret: it's not easy for an actor to do commercials!
“There is another aspect to this question. From the point of view of the “enlightened” European there is not much left for us to do to induce absolutely everyone to take not a passive, but an active part in cooperative operations. Strictly speaking, there is “only” one thing we have left to do and that is to make our people so “enlightened” that they understand all the advantages of everybody participating in the work of the cooperatives, and organizes participation. “only” the fact. There are now no other devices needed to advance to socialism. But to achieve this “only", there must be a veritable revolution—the entire people must go through a period of cultural development.”
- Marc Erlich, Intellectual Property Counsel for Patent Portfolio Management;
6. Post my giveaway on your blog!
ZongZi (Bamboo Leaf Rice Wraps) - all amount are approximate, all fillings are optional. You can make this vegetarian. History of the Food
This week holds three birthdays in our household, two basketball games, return to school schedule and a new year. Could you load anymore in one week?
"Wilderness is not a luxury but a necessity of the human spirit, and as vital to our lives as water and good bread. A civilization which destroys what little remains of the wild, the spare, the original, is cutting itself off from its origins and betraying the principle of civilization itself."
Sass Jordan twittered this some weeks ago. It’s so to the point! This quote made me realize, that everything is about making choices. Here it’s the choice of who you make your music for. And there are always people who don’t like it, especially if you dare to be outspoken. This will give you more extreme reactions than if you stay mainstream: people will really love you for what you do, and some might hate you for it. The difficulty is to become aware that not everyone will love you.
Two minutes' thought - on that I may depend
Like it or not, what’s yours will very soon be others. Often, for free. Just ask the large recording labels.
Anyway, I came across a few looks that I instantly fell in love with and decided to share it with all you lovely people out there.
I wear the shirt three days in a row, before I see this:
Cut the fennel into thick slices, keeping their tops aside. Melt the knob of butter with a dash of olive oil in a pan and put over a low heat, add the fennel slices and leave to carmalise slowly (30 - 40 mins)
These incidents sparked concern among US and western counter-terrorism agencies that implanted bombs might be a more effective way for militants to evade airport security devices including X-ray machines and metal detectors.
Because he has given up helping,
Mr. Dahl: "What are you thinking about?"
My feelings during the first conversation are quite difficult to recall. If I remember correctly, I was a bit afraid, a bit shocked and a bit confused. I do remember thinking, ‘Oh no, my Mummy is not my Mummy; I don’t have a Mummy. And my Daddy is not my Daddy. I don’t have a Daddy!’ and ‘What if this Mummy and Daddy give me away like my ‘real’ Mummy did?!’
We are to sit in a circle
PS.:
Rebekkah stared too, but when she had given up hope, made food and ate it, in fact, I kept searching. And finally I saw it. The tiny, hair line crack in the ground before the first painting. (It was so small because we had a small TV… details are not easily seen). “Ha!” One ground pound into the hidden room and I was moving again. I picked up the items, hit the switches and continued on.
My Monday post about what is going on around my home...
1/4 cup pesto (the recipe calls for sun-dried tomato pesto, but you can use any kind depending on what flavor you’re looking for)
I finally got up the nerve to show B. my writing a few weeks ago. I’ve been writing for several years, but up until now haven’t shown it to anyone. Not only was it painful it was downright atrocious. But it got better. After years of pounding my head against the typewriter it did get better. To the point where I think it is pretty respectable, so I took a big breath and gave B. a copy to read. Just to let you know that I really didn’t want to let him read it, he bugged me to the point where I basically shoved it at him in order to get him to shut up. Well he read it, and really liked it. Bed news is that now he’s bugging me to show some of our friends who actually write for a living. Yeah. No amount of bugging, begging, or threatening is going to make that happen. Why?
“You won’t keep your arms still enough for us to start a line, we may have to go in through your neck.” She responded.
This bread is made using my barm, cooked potatoes, the potato water, bread flour, yeast, salt, chopped chives, and sharp cheddar cheese. It is one of my absolute favorites from this book and the fact it is a one day bread makes it an extra bonus! Although, I'll need to plan out eating this bread in the future because if dinner tonight is any indication, I'll need to plan ahead for eating nothing but bread for a whole meal.
What's funny is I tried other diets before and because I was so limited on what I chose to eat from the plan, I never stuck with the diet for long. I'd last a week or two and then give up.
When I gave its stalk a twist.
“The Somali government will not take lightly the danger from their official union and will put all its forces, as well as the general public, on the highest alert.”
“I’m with Tom,” Chris said, “the sergeant.”
How the uncool girl was dictating to everyone what was cool reminds me of many, many fashion magazines. Take Seventeen's August issue. (I just read it because my dad neglected to tell me he gave it to me until recently, and he has my September copy.) Anywho, I love the section where they tell you the cutest stuff at the mall, so you don't have to work that tiny brain of yours to pick out something you like and put your own outfit together. I mean really, who has time for thinking for themselves?
We now have a hanging rack located in between two shelving units so all hang ups are now in closet area too. Pics to come. Rule is that all shirts are hung up...even t-shirts. They are much easier to locate that way and no longer are lost in massive wadded up messes. Small house closets are now used for sleeping bag storage and rods are used for girls long dresses and skirts. I. am. happy.
For beauty, for love, for something up above, and now mercy is on my lips and
Sprint Blackberry (sprintblackberry.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Which leads me to were I am at now. I believe it is important to have a 1 year supply of food on hand that you eat normally. I agree with this fully heartily. Especially after reading what I have about the economy and I want my family to be prepared.
Holder recently issued a memo to Southwest border attorneys ordering them not to permit arms trafficking to Mexican cartels. The memo states, “We should not design or conduct undercover operations which include guns crossing the border.” Logically, a memo advising justice officials not to engage in illegal gunwalking would be unnecessary were it not for a precedent to the contrary.
She found her way deep into the forest and was momentarily taken aback by a loud roar. Suddenly, a large troll, bigger than anything she’d ever seen before, bounded out of the shadows, punched her in the face, knocked her to the ground and then squeezed the life out of her.
This is an amazing punk album with lots of melody and emotion. I will post more Down By Law albums in the future.
Free- All Right Now (Fire and Water LP- 1970, single- 1970)
“Very well Rollin, the deal is struck.” Leranhin agreed and Ben couldn’t track the passage of time as slowly he found himself turning somehow unreasonably satisfied, even pleased, to leave the house. It was under a sky that held a higher and brighter sun than a speechless corner of his mind knew it should, that he finally and quite directionlessly wandered his way again home, to lose grasp on even yet more.
My Mother-in-Law loves her tea and I wanted to make sure to incorporate that into her Mother's Day card! Since I was unable to find a very simple tea cup to cut that I liked, I decided that it was something that I could easy create on my own in the Funtime software. Once again, referring to the wonderful training videos offered by Boss Kut I got to work.
Jewish tradition loves to offer a multitude of explanations for customs, most of which have nothing to the do with the actual origin of the customs but which range from giving ethical insight to directing attention to the text of the Bible to downright entertainment. Among the various reasons we have heard for why dairy food is eaten on Shavuot, these ten stand out (as you read them, remember that Shavuot is traditionally held to be the day on which God gave the Torah to the nation of Israel at Mount Sinai.)
The novel has already had praise heaped upon it by a number of notable authors including Fay Weldon and Joanne Harris.
People forget that that all human beings are born free. It is society and its stereotype selfish rules that hold them in bondage. Draupadi waged a war to regain her lost respect. She lost a lot in the process but she gained realization about the futility of relationships, about the vulnerability of weakening emotions and about the illusion of life itself. As each part of her sari slipped off her body, she watched the valiant and the righteous fail and fall. It was her heart-felt devotion to God that finally saved her from being stripped, paraded and raped in public. At least, Krishna came to her rescue then (God incarnate or not.). What about the disadvantaged disrobed desh ki mahila today?
Interim Liberal leader Bob Rae accused the Tories of trying to punish refugees and whip up hostility against them.
Step 2: Decide on a theme for your project. By coming up with one set of supplies, it helps your album go together so much faster. Figure out coordinating cardstock colors & limit them to 3 or 4 colors. These are the supplies I came up with...
Watch this video on comets and see what you think:
A cop car slowly comes down the street again and this time pick-up guy meets up with him and they start talking. And there it is. Mr Mountain Lion or Bobcat just walking down the sidewalk. Strolling. Out for an after dinner constitutional. Now both cop cars quickly pull up with their bright lights shining on it. They actually try to box it in with their cars. One races down the street and then turns around and shines its lights on the cat and the other cop car does the same from the other direction. What they forget is that the damn cat just has to cut across the street from the side not blocked off...which it does.
I am such a Gemini! *sigh*
Ask yourself the question and think about it. The answers might take some working out, but there is something you can do. There are things we can all do.
Love lust lead to the leaving,
Instead, I’d demonize prosperity itself, so that they will not miss what they will never have.
“I’m not going to criticize President Bruininks,” he said, because he wasn’t on the board then and wasn’t privy to Bruininks’ decisions. “We want the right balance for decision-making for the president’s office and the board. … At what level it starts and what it looks like is what we will be focusing on. At the end of the day we want to be smart about changes.”
But she adds that the media is in a slightly different position. “Unlike the American Constitution, ours confers no special status to the press beyond ‘freedom of speech and expression‘, but the media still remains a trustee. The public relies on the media for responsible dissemination of news, and this must be taken into account. As long as the guidelines do not unreasonably restrict the freedom of speech and expression, the media cannot protest.” Welcoming the move, court reporter-turned-advocate Rajiv Wagh said, “Reporting court proceedings is quite different from covering politics or crime. One does not need technical knowledge to cover those subjects. Some training imparted by news organisations would be helpful. The court itself could also consider running short training programs specifically for court reporters.”
Moon turned back to Kelly the collie with his mouth wide open.
We moved on to the next plane. The larger less idolized B-24 Liberator was standing with its red and white tail fins painted vividly and with acute precision. This plane was much easier to get into.
Thank you Mom for sacrificing your comfort for ours.
CAIRO, Aug. 19 -- Israel closed the door Sunday on a surge of asylum-seekers from Sudan's Darfur region and from other African countries, the largest influx of non-Jewish refugees in the modern history of the Jewish state.
The images of an underworld below us (or across an expanse of water), sometimes referred to as “the pit” is an appropriately abysmal image – particularly as the place is devoid of hope or salvation. This is the most haunting idea of suffering in the afterlife – never ending torment. Even the travails of living, no matter how horrific, will end with death. We are freed from suffering. This is not necessarily so in some cosmologies.
The how is the tricky part. I think meditation helps, though, if for no other reason than it slows me down and gives me time to look.
Pure Maple Syrup has many health benefits. Pure maple syrup has manganese, which disarms free radicals. Pure maple syrup is good for your heart (thanks to the zinc), and it is good for the immune system (also due to zinc and the manganese).
She's looks like a Rastafarian, but really she's wearing her Scylla creation.
That's all! Good luck!
Today is my first official day as LateNightStampers Design Team Member, I was the guest designer last month and Mary Jo asked me to stay on and I happily accepted. This weeks LateNightStampers Challenge is Gift Card Holders. I spent alot of time last week messing around and looking at alot of gift card holders and I finally just winged it and made this one. I didn't follow any written tutorial but for this "Present Gift Card Holder". It was super simple, here is a pic of the inside:
﻿﻿You could describe it as a community pub: it has a bowling green, 4 darts teams, 2 quiz teams and a pool team. They have an open mike night on Thursdays, and every Sunday evening they hold a quiz, karaoke and bingo. Like most pubs, it has suffered a downturn in trade recently, and it has eccentric opening hours during the week (such as 10 p.m. closing on Wednesday), which probably doesn't help, but I do know this is the decision of the brewery, not the licensee.
A preliminary reference to the ECJ from the Swedish Supreme Court deals with the ability of copyright owners to obtain details about the identity of users connected to a certain Internet Protocol address which was used to infringe copyright.
We headed back to Lexie’s to freshen up before we headed over to Folly’s Beach. It’s about a 20 minute drive from the College to the beach. It would’ve been really nice that day but it was so windy! I did get to see the pier from Dear John though.
Rick Santorum is not a conservative Republican. His statements are not indicative of the current Republican mentality or platform; his statements display blatant disdain toward the homosexual lifestyle and wax homophobic. In a June 16 tweet, Mayor Bloomberg (New York City, independent) said, “The Republican party stands for personal liberty and freedom. Marriage equality is entirely consistent with that.”
10. Swimming Home
10. Tiger balm/Arnica: Tiger balm smells, Arnica doesn’t. Take your pick. Personally, I don’t mind the tiger balm smell as long as I’m not going to be in public. Both relieve pain from sore muscles and aches or whatever else is ailing you and both are natural treatments that have been used for years.
Joel & Michelle Levey have taught thousands of people around the globe to live in greater harmony and balance. Field-tested and refined over many years, the Leveys’ unique approach to stress-mastery and personal development offers step-by-step guidance for developing your personal strengths, enhancing the quality of your life, and making a real contribution to your world.
As I was getting ready to hit the publish button, Rohan came in with another 15 inch large mouth bass!!
.blink….blink…..yeah….small smile…...no worries…..sure…....this will work……ARE YOU NUTS???”
So it comes down to this: the one thing the President has the latitude to do that would have a concrete, practical impact on marriage equality, he has done. And where he doesn't have the authority, he has taken a stand. (Maybe not as forcefully or as frequently as some people would like, but he has taken a stand.)
It’s been almost a quarter century since Public Enemy famously asked “Who gives a fuck about a goddamn Grammy?” on their classic album It Takes A Nation of Millions To Hold Us Back, and we’re still referencing that line every year when we write these reminders that the Grammys are garbage.
Computers were supposed to save labor, but only some of the labor they save is inessential. Nancy, who lives in Grosse Point, near Detroit, offers her own example:
as bats to swing for the fences
It appears the current phase of Europe’s debt crisis is entering its last hour. We’ll know soon, but it’s possible the weekend of May 5, 2012, will be remembered as a transformative moment in the history of Europe.
…can buckle his carseat almost all by himself.
My last boyfriend fucked with my head in ways that have nothing to do with this post, and I am only just now beginning to think that it might be time to put the hunting gear on again.
Not sure on dinner, we have baseball practice and that sucks up a lot of time. I’m a little sluggish right now, hopefully by next week all of this sugar withdrawl will be gone. It just a little over a day it has taken a small toll on me. Nothing MAJOR but enough for me to notice.
But I did have a little play .. ..
I was originally going to make this a picture post, but then I found a neat video that encapsulates what this is about. So lets start with that. For best effect, full screen the video (click on the little icon that looks like a frame on the bottom right of the vid).
FH: Yes.
If anyone has other useful content or connections (there must be a lot more out there! )please add in with comments on this post.
Five sisters. Tati, the beautiful one, destined to fall in love with a man lost to the fairies. Jena, the sensible one, who searches for her own destiny as she tries to hold all the threads of her family’s life together. Iulia, the romantic one. Paula, the scholar. And Stela, the youngest.
If you go through their theories side by side, you see Einstein basically ripped Poincare at the wholesale rate, like he got a discount or something. Oh sure, it’s all circumstantial, and just haters trying to down the Stein, but is it? If you don’t believe, at the end of the article peruse all the sources you like and notice how Poincare precedes Einstein, and how about 100 years later – give or take a few years – Poincare finally started getting his due, not that anyone is paying attention because then what would retailers do with all that cool Einstein swag?
the name of profit
A few therapists ago, I had one who told me some upsetting news and then he asked me to read his face. It reminded me of a scene from Bones where Sweets is trying to teach Brennan how to read facial expressions and then manipulate people into opening up to her.
There is still time to make your own kit if you would like! Here are the 12 days of Easter:
My hair was not quite shoulder length when I went in for the hair appointment. My stylist, a long-time friend, tried to talk me out of putting my hair through that torture, but I was adamant. I wanted a perm. She relented. We rolled, and processed, and rinsed, and trimmed, and styled, and I was horrified. I didn't have the wavy bouncy cuteness that had been in my mind's eye. I was a freaking poodle. Shirley Temple was reincarnated. I hated it.
Considering these incidents, it has occurred to me that there is a general lack of respect for the rule of law. Actions like these are (according to my thoughts) performed by those on the lower end of the economic scale and illustrate that lack of respect whereas at the top end of the economic scale are examples of Pres 0 who I heard on TV in Poland giving a speech. I will take kudos for keeping quiet at the time as I was in a visit, but it was a massive injection of self-control not to yell at the image of our obammanator telling the Poles that he was restricted by laws and could only follow what they dictated. He would try to influence the congress, but he was not free in his actions. Dare I recount a few (there aren’t enough electrons for unabridged) examples: czars appointed and paid for by taxpayers without any review of congress, lack of enforcement of our borders, TSA groping, shakedown of BP post oil spill, violations of the Hatch act, partial cooperation of FIOA with supporters and lack of cooperation with opponents, starting a war without congressional information let alone approval and then telling congress that none is needed. That’s just a sprinkling off the top of my head. Throw congress in and there is Rangel who commits 11 counts of tax fraud (I’m lumping, go get the details elsewhere) and keeps his seat in congress. Where would any of us be?
Karla: It was a pleasure! Good luck with book 4 in the Redwood Pack series, as well as your other projects. Now, here’s a bit MORE info about Carrie Ann, and an excerpt from her newest release, A NIGHT AWAY.
Already a $200 million dollar “insider’s brand,” Pantone Inc. is working on becoming a household name. With 15% of total company revenue currently coming from it’s consumer-product licensing projects it’s easily imaginable that the Pantone color matching system will soon be known by more than the design community.
Maybe I should have held on to that piece of memorabilia? Nah…but the memories are fun!
so many other shops.
"Did you get my text?"
Fishin' in the dirt, in our redneck back yard with piles of discarded wood and demolition refuse.
Charlie was already O-U-T and snoring,
We climbed up a rough footpath from the front in El Golf to the Yaiza road, where a vehicle track heads north west, past an impressive villa on the hillside, before dropping down towards the coast through the lava fields to the black sand of Playa del Paso. From there the path becomes a narrow ribbon cleared of most of the larger rocks, which are laid on either side to mark the route.
Just as Obama “inherited” the financial crisis of 2008, Romney is going to inherit “Taxageddon” in 2013 if a GOP controlled Congress does not repeal significant increases in taxes, all of which will stall any effort to get the economy back on a growth track.
Brooklyn is a place to rest. Lounge even. That's the way I see it.
22. “Satellite” by The Kills
This program may incorporate various health improvement, maintenance, and prevention regimes. Recommendations may include vitamins, minerals, herbs, supplements, and/or diet and nutrition, among other suggestions.
Panasonic has released a new Super Zoom camera, the DMC-FZ150, which replaces their DMC-FZ100. With a 12MP sensor and a zoom of 25-600mm anyone that is looking for a camera in their category may be wanting to take a look at Panasonic’s new offering.
OK - your turn. What's bugging you today? What is your PET PEEVE?
I like to make a monthly menu to reduce the “stress” of deciding what is for dinner each night. If you know me, to get me to choose a restaurant or something to eat takes an act of Congress.
A new tutorial and challenge on Shabby Chic design was added to StampNation this week. There are now 182 video tutorial on StampNation, WOW!! You should head over and check us out. The ladies there sure are a hoot!
profile 2012 based on data
I would agree with it’s reputation as having a strong smell and tasting “barnyardy”. I liked the “barnyardy” flavor but it was not a hit with my wife and kids. Then again, they don’t like the stronger cheeses that I often enjoy. I found reference to it tasting like a cheddar and I don’t agree with that. I would consider it a very distant cousin to a cheddar. It does have a nice mildy spicy finish that lingers.
1/2 t baking soda
And when it does I'm gonna run outside and do some kind of elated Flashdance fast feet and Rocky-style air punching.
The Fancy Farm girl and that she is!, you MUST google her chicken COOP! WOW..
Rev. Michael Beckwith is hosting a free teleconference on the 21st, and here’s the access information:
and when my back was turned, she retrieved the nasty, gooey, mess from the trash can, put it in her plastic teacup and sat down to eat it with a spoon...
At first I was a little annoyed to learn that whoever wrote “My Country Tis of Thee” was too lazy to come up with a unique melody and had to resort to borrowing it from the UK. But then my sister suggested that it was done as a sort of slap in the face, taking something meaningful to the British people and turning it into a song about America. So now I’m okay with it.
This is a pretty good query at this point, but now you need to make sure your novel shows the same polish. Are you over explaining there? Did you front-load the novel with a bunch of backstory and set up? One way to find out is to look at where the novel starts. Does it start with Marine dancing with the Duke? If it does not, you might want to think about changing that.
That is all for now - happy requesting everybody!
Here are the caveats:
I know that many people feel they have their answers to that last question, some theologically, some via science but personally I don’t. Another bunch of folk seem to think we can’t answer such questions. I don’t agree. I think since many of us have dumped traditional theological answers or scientific reductionist responses as inadequate we’ve kind of given up questioning. I think we need to keep questioning because whilst we are subject to many biochemical reactions to life events there is a deeper reality.
None of my other companions had stopped. Perhaps they hadn't heard the scream, maybe they were scared, maybe they didn't care. As I walked back a boy came stumbling out of the darkness, he was crying. When he saw me, he screamed and ran to me like a child lost in the woods. Which is what he was. He wasn't hurt, he was just scared. He had never been away from home. He was just a kid frightened of the dark. When everyone scattered toward their tents, he hadn't known the way and was left behind in his indecision.
Part 1: An Introduction To The Patient
While I think Romney will have his earflaps handed to him in the fall, I couldn’t be more delighted that the knives are out for Newt.
Quiet my soul remember
There’s nothing left in the world.
“Hiç kimsesi yok,” he explained at last, “hiç.”
So in the social interchange where someone lacks the basic human decency to lie to your face, Holly has no reason to feel badly. Of course, that doesn’t mean once the slight was slid… slighted? Once the doors were open, Holly couldn’t employ the LWL to gently nudge the situation and remind the other party to start Mannering it up. Things like:
Then we made two more decisions that many people make which set us on a trajectory to having more stuff, 1) we bought a house (bigger than our apartment) and 2) we decided to have kids. We bought the house first and people tend to fill the space that they live in. We tried to keep things minimal, but living in an empty house also seems kind of silly. Then we had kids. Between baby showers and grandparents these little 7 to 8 pound bundles of joy come with an incredible amount of stuff for being unable to eat solid foods, walk, sit up or burp without help. They continually acquire new stuff every year for birthdays and new clothes as they grow faster than sea monkeys.
Minter
“The respondent shall vacate his position as the president of the ANC Youth League,” said chairman Derek Hanekom in Johannesburg.
My blog has been read 10,000 times, I can't believe that!
“The creative process consists in the unconscious activation of an archetypal image, and in elaborating and shaping this image into the finished work.“
So if you wonder what it means if an insider trading bill promotes insider trading, and if a job promotion bill is really an effort to further deregulate the market, then we need to return to Cantor’s book and his statement that he had come from a “…place that believes in hard work being rewarded. I had come to a place where special interests are rewarded.” Page 29, 30, Young Guns). Well, I come from that same place, Richmond, Virginia.
- Cascade Mountain Distillery gin
Row 2:
I can see the beautiful of love and
5:07 - Girls wake up
I don’t really believe in a soul-mate (or sole-mate as I read on someone’s profile the other day, definitely something fishy about him or maybe he just likes feet!). I don’t believe in love at first sight either. I reckon that if you went into a room with a dozen men, the chances are you’d get on well enough with at least one of them not to want to kill him.
As I said before, I wanted it to be good, and although it wasn't horrific, it wasn't anything that I would buy again. In just over a year, as far as I can see, it hasn't managed to establish itself in an already overpopulated sector of the beer market, of which the Stella brand have two beers anyway, and no amount of marketing or fancy names is going to change that. The poor choice of target market and misleading name is discussed with much more elegance and depth in one of Pete Brown's old blogs here, and Melissa Cole's blog here.
It's almost impossible to accurately describe this 470-year old eclectic, Colonial town in the desert of Central Mexico. The narrow cobblestone streets wind through homes and buildings in vibrant colors of tomato red, cobalt blue, and sunny yellow. Bright fuchsia bougainvillea drips over doors in alleyways, and giant jacaranda trees tower overhead with purple blooms.
I stopped parading down the aisle long enough to sit down and talk with my friend. I was surprised to learn that the kids dad hadn't been paying child support all year. The mom was struggling to pay the bills. This month alone, my friend lent her rent money and told her not to pay her back for a while--at least until she can afford to without being homeless. The church had been kind enough to provide the kids with school supplies. And the extra shifts the mom was working would be enough to keep her afloat for a while, and her bills would be caught up.
Foundation is everything. Here is where many folks don't even realize just what it is the horse needs for a complete foundation. I have never known a horse that Tom has trained give it's owner a dangerous time. I have seen him work at things that no ordinary person or trainer would think of doing with a horse. What is added (in the way of another layer) will give the horse a sense of security, a sense of purpose, a sense that he can satisfy the human, a developed habit to willingly obey, a complete job description (if you will) in how to act around humans. The horse is taught how to reply to discipline. The horse is given a "peace zone" where they have a reference place to go when things become scary or overwhelming for them. If things go really bad, the horse knows to override the instinct to run and stands instead. I like that layer! I have been in a place where I made a bad decision and instead of my horse blowing up to run and get us both hurt, he simply stayed in place until I could extricate us from my driver error that caused a turnover. Many layers are added with a "soaking in" period in between. There is no recipe he follows...it is the individual horse that determines how to proceed and what is needed and taught.
I've post up the pics on FB and the link for my non-FB readers is below:
My southern friend’s people all probably lived within a small sphere of a community. As I write this, I am sitting alone in a hotel room in Germany. My people are far away. Yet I can count on their presence the same way know you can count on the neighbor down the street.
I differ in the process with #2. I didn’t really lead with knowledge/ strength, I just incorporated that into my writing. I guess Writing is one of the most important skills to learn! I also differed with #4. I don’t need to find more name since I was offered a job. I do have to admit, that I wouldn’t have asked for more names if I wasn’t offered the job. I didn’t even think about asking in that case. I guess we learn something new everyday! What have you learned?
And, as a nursery checklist reminder, the following projects still need to be completed:
I need to thank my friend and social justice activist Eva Hoffman for inspiring me to write this story.
I’m posting this on a Sunday so as not to distract from the usual line of posting during the week, but I wanted to say one further thing about David Winner’s Brilliant Orange and more specifically about total football.
I forgive myself that I have accepted and allowed myself to resist writing about relationships because of the judgements I have towards myself in relation to relationships and how I have fucked myself up within this point of who I am as myself as my own self relationship where in I basically see myself as a complete fuck-up with so far to go that to even think about relationships brings a point of despair in thinking how far away this point of me actually being in an effective agreement must be due to how much I have accepted and allowed myself to fuck myself and continue to fuck myself and have not found it within myself to actually walk in self respect and self dignity and self honesty so that I actually see myself as fit for an agreement or relationship with another being.
Julia Friend
This layout I used Stampin' up cardstock, Webster pages paper (also used them for handmade flower) and stickers, Glimmer Mist, Prima flower and ink, Tara Green Flower. A2Z Chipboard, Kasiercraft paint and rhinestone, cuttlebug
They’ve brought a breath of fresh air with their “I Want…” commercial.
The Dr. Speedy Network of Clinical Excellence has been conducting a PACE (Properly Acquiring Clinical Evidence) trial over the last 80 years or so.
And the conference registration fee, which was worth every penny.
I still have more to post but need to get some other projects done (along with our taxes)... Stay tuned!
10) knit , knit 2 together, around
Segway insists that they are doing quite well financially, although they will not release any financial details of their company. I cannot believe that they are doing all that well, because who the fuck would buy one of these things? The inventor, Dean Kamen, obviously does not understand the American market. The only people who can ride Segways are young, fit people; the same kind of people who make a fetish of exercise, and ride bikes when they have cars that work perfectly fine. They are not likely to ride something that will not tone their butts, and makes them look like a doofus, besides.
And surprisingly this didn't bother me too much. We ate a few meals at the buffet in our hotel, and it was pretty bad, but it was bad in a nice, familiar way, which was weird until I figured it out. It had as much to do with the ambiance as it did with the mooshy textures and neon colors. Aside from a few odd decorating choices and all the morbidly obese old people, it looked, sounded and smelled exactly like a school lunch room.
“17? You sure you want to get into this? When Sal takes you he has you for life. We’re your ‘new family’.” She rolled her eyes.
I was busy lately,I was trying to understand who sneaked into my mind’s labyrinth and gained control of my own “free” will .How the hell they pressed the correct button and I’ve been following the sheep for quite some time.
We have already seen the sub-1000 dollar computer. Then the sub-500. And now the sub-200.
Week 12 Off Centre
Who are these men with covert ways who bring Earth its pain? They are the men who cannot help. Who are the women who must be helped but who can only maim? They say, these men and women, that they’ll help and then they make a thorough shambles of it all.
Today my friend, Tara from 4th Grade Folics came to the classroom for Book Buddies. Her kids were paired up with my kiddos. It went great as the one thing my kids love, is to be read to. We are planning on doing it every 2 weeks when we don't get specials (due to budget cuts). It was nice to finally have a break where I was free to walk around and take pictures.
Keep in mind that this was before Lady Gaga – and other name-brand celebrities – made it trendy to support the LGBT community.
This is her tree from this year.
understanding will have people celebrating the changes, instead of
Yuuki from Peach Love gyarusa
“I came over the wall.”
Publisher: CrossBooks Publishing (August 24, 2011)
I posted this card the other day with my descriptions of Orioles nominated for the Fun-Time Hall of Fame but it got me wondering just how common this was in the '70s and if it happens much nowadays.
When the NEP was first introduced, many Malay lives were transformed. This is no longer true. The new middle-class Malays keep quiet about the abuse of the NEP. They are trapped in their own secure world, fearing they might lose it. They are too selfish to help poorer Malays and the other non-Malays.
2/3 cup extra virgin olive oil, or more if you like it thinner
I just did a simple thread sewing to catch my hanger...
Miss You
One altogether; not by confusion of Substance, but by unity of Person.
And the TSA, they all ran away
So should a protester expect to be arrested tomorrow?
Home, where my love lies waitin' silently for me
I had to think about this one for a while and eventually resorted to the dictionary and thesaurus for the definition of “Possibility”.
Attorney Christian: Your Honor I object! All civilized people know this outrageous tale has been thoroughly refuted by science. Hyoid bones are totally chimp like not human in any way. Of course evolutionists deny it. Why did they present fake Pilt Down Man to the world if they ever had anything authentic? Let us not forget lying Lucy!
As for me, I continue to ignore the wishes of my neighbors and the numerous ordinances the town has enacted against me and play Auld Lang Syne on my bagpipes in front of the house at midnight, on New Years Eve. I’m sure they secretly enjoy it and are just too shy to say. Other performances this year with the full pipe band, have included St. Patrick’s day at several pubs in the Des Moines area, and four different parades. Short, rainy, cool parades, beat long, hot, humid parades.
So…be your name Buxbaum or Bixby or Bray or Mordecai Ale Van Allen O’Shea, you’re off to Great Places!
Secrets by Freya North
One hour of torture. One hour of Jill yelling and making me feel like my tension wasn’t high enough so I would make it higher. We would bike hard for 20 seconds and then stop for barely 10. And then it continued. None of us had any sense of time- I thought was going to be there forever….At one point- she said “new girls, don’t do this I want you to build up more muscle.” The three of us were immediately flooded with relief. Amen.
Minnie & Friends Character Breakfast
Are they “misguided ideologues”, or just plain terrorists who are now blinded by their recent “successes” that they cannot even spot their “class enemies”? Are the Maoists brutalising the masses in much the same way they accuse the State of doing? Are the Maoists any different from Al Qaeda, Lashkar-e-Toiba, LTTE or any terror outfit you can name?
I roll my eyes, “I think I’ve learnt my lesson about playing in the company sandbox.”
5. Twitter about my giveaway!
He only talked about it once. Said that it was the most frightening thing he has ever witnessed and hoped that he would never have to witness it again. It was a girl. A teenager. She was speaking in different voices and climbing the walls. Weird, huh?!
You wrote to me a few years ago. I do not WANT your writing on my site. Television is ruining your life because you're obsessed with television as the devil.
i have a really hard time when my first try isn't right, but i'm learning to move on and try again.
The audio in this video is a bit weak, Administrator Armendariz says:
If you like fast-paced books with lots of things going on, you'll be bored after fifty pages because nothing much happens. Go on reading. Nothing much happends for the next 400 pages either. (The book is 496 pages long).
For books, the style required for the reference list should be: Author surname followed by given names with first (or legal) given name in full and others as initials, followed by the year of publication in parentheses, and a full stop/period. The title of the book should be italicised, with its principal words beginning with a capital letter, and should end with a full stop/period. The publisher's name should then be given, with the town or city of publication included in parentheses. If the book is co-authored by two authors, their names should be separated by an ampersand; if co-authored by more than two, all but the last name should be separated by commas, and the last name should be separated by an ampersand. Here are some hypothetical examples:
Love should be.
Later on in the day, my buddy Alex (Mr “fix-it/anything” from my postproduction days and great friend) came buy and is gonna help me out with the electrics. He seemed quite confident with most of it, he’s gonna make me a schematic (!) and clean up and fix a few things. He had a go at that stuck solenoid nut but “no go”. If Alex can’t loosen it, it’s stuck for good till replacement.
Celine :*
That’s where you’ll find the Sime~Gen novels, and several collections of my own short stories, plus forthcoming this year an anthology of Vampire stories by online based fanfic writers — mostly fans who wrote Forever Knight fanfic. It’s titled VAMPIRE’S DILEMMA.
Believe it оr not, thеre іѕ а line bеtweеn sexy and slutty whеn referring to Halloween costumes. Most оf the store bought varieties do а vеry good job of leaving ѕomе detail to the imagination аnd keeping a hint оf allure. Some manufacturers even provide a "Sexy Line" of some costumes fоr thоse who decide tо show оff a little mоre skin. Crossing the aforementioned line bу simply wearing little morе than lingerie not only shows a lack of creativity, but саn be viewed аѕ аn equivalent to а "This IS my costume T-shirt" on a guy.
When I was eleven years old, I overheard my brother ask our dad if he believed in Atlantis, and something inside of me leapt with recognition. I knew, without any doubt, that there had once been a wondrous place called Atlantis, though I hadn’t any idea what or where that place might be. The very word seemed like a beacon, illuminating an incredible and mysterious past. Until then, I’d never heard of Atlantis, never even had a concept of lost civilizations, and yet, there it was . . . that instantaneous knowing.
4/5 and I can't WAIT to read book 3!
07-07 London, England – Wireless Festival
In love and light,
It is not because Valentines day is fast approaching and I am single because I do not care about it one bit. No today I was taking a break from working and decided to relax, but the wicked can never rest, because as soon as I tried, the phone rings with a friend on the other line needing some emotional support after a break up. I am there to help the friends who have broken down, the friends struggling, those whose relationships have failed! It’s all in a days work, but at the same time it is sort of draining, something which sucks the life out of you. No one likes being dumped nor breaking up with their lover, but sometimes in life there are obstacles and difference in views that sometimes it cannot be helped. But I don’t feel like I can be a friend anymore. They say a true friend sticks around through the good, bad and the rough, but somehow I seem to carry a lot of friends who only go through the rough and never really through the happy times. I am not saying that all my friends are draining- this feels terrible saying but it is the truth that I need to face. I am tired of always trying to fight a losing battle. I should not give up I know, but it is so hard yet so easy to just throw in the towel. Friendships shouldn’t have to be this difficult and some of my other friendships aren’t but most of my friendships nowadays I view as a burden! I obviously have let them become too dependent on me and sometimes it is important to say NO.
I love the idea of Shimer. I love what Shimer is once in a blue moon.
i’m watching this thing my cousin recommended. it’s a lot of fast cuts and explosions, space travel, and a bunch of kill-or-be-killed interactions. who does that? only those who benefit from the plunder of resources that inevitably occurs in the aftermath. poor people, you cannot contribute to the furtherance of humanity by taking up arms. that is the ill-founded logic of your retardo-cult. knock that shit off
My, what other (shitty little) country in the Middle East had a similar plan in 1948 - how did it work out again?
Because this lesson involves mixing, it's important that each child has his/her own palette. In my case, it's recycled styrofoam trays. Paper plates are ideal. Squirt a dime-sized amount of red, blue and yellow tempera paint onto each plate. Set water containers and brushes on the tables.
because he always learned from his difficult experiences and mistakes in life. this made him a very
Getting there and Getting Home: From Oxford Circus, walk up Great Portland or Great Titchfield Street until you reach Langham street. The Langham Court Hotel is the building brilliantly clad in black-and-white tiles, as though it were dressed up for the races in 1901. Go in by the central entrance, and straight down the stairs in front of you. Five minutes from Oxford Circus, and closes at 23:00, so getting home is not a problem.
My baby sister is here from the East coast for a visit.
The series features carefully curated underground/indie international musicians in equally interesting venues ultimately bringing you an original music experience the likes of which have never been seen in South Africa before”
I hate them. Never liked them. Have always been afraid of them. I have no idea from which my fear stems, I just remember always feeling this way. Me + ground = good. Me + not on the ground = I’m going to die, You’re going to die, WE’RE ALL GOING TO DIIIIIEEEEEEE.
I was just feeling rather maudlin about this when I came across Littlest's resolutions from last year, which Mr Coffee had transcribed for her. These are resolutions I hope we can all try to keep this year.
Oh man, that spring forward thing totally made me sleepy today. I could barely handle it! We had a pretty productive morning though, we're still suessing it, but not as intensely. Im just finished up the activities we didn't get to the past two weeks.
is def on my top scent list now!
Cold weather is upon us once again, which means that it is time to plant some garlic!
So here’s the question; If you have to take slabs on a houseboat (and let’s assume there are no ‘Float-Thru Bottleshops to buy anything once you’re away) which TWO BEERS do you choose? For the purposes of the exercise let’s say you’re away for two weeks. One for each slab. Some of you may want to team up with someone else if two slabs is not enough.
Work days at the Hanger were never pleasant, but today’s happenings had nearly driven him to the edge. Lucian tightened his grip on the parchment in his hand.
The minutes are ticking by in Night of the Demons and nothing much has happened...
Today I am going up to campus to help with the Onesies Orientation. "Onesies" are what I lovingly refer to first term nursing students as. SO happy I am not one of those anymore. Ha! Did I tell you I am the secretary of the Student Nurse's Association? Step aside...the SECRETARY is coming through. Hahah! But, hey...hopefully it will look good to employers, no?! :) Anywho...I am going up there to help our President, Angela, out. I'll say it again--so glad I am not in first term anymore. God Bless those little onesies and what they are going to endure for the next few months. They have no idea! LOL! Ok, I'll get off my Term III high-horse and say goodbye for now!
I really want a neat color...and I have always loved red...I don't want a read house per se...but something close to it....
Right now I start every single day in pain. I am lucky, I don’t start every day in pain, 365 days per year. In fact I had been moderately pain free since December. But about a week ago it was as if I had walked into a wall, been hit by a bus and run over by a train all at once. There wasn’t a single joint, bone or muscle in my body that did not ache. I should have know the signs were there, the stress (5 weeks left of term, grades are due and national tests are looming), the dizzy spells and the headaches, yet I was surprised when the pain hit all at once. What does this have to do with the book I just read? Well it is a book about pain management. It is written for both pain sufferers, their loved ones and those who come into contact with them, both privately and professionally. And boy do I wish more people had read it.
Anyway…a quick synopsis of the past 5 weeks or so. I went with Nick to Aruba for a very necessary vacation. I only took photos of food, especially because nobody wants to see me in a bikini after all the drinks and crap I ate.
I hate that. Should what? Not feel, not fall, behave, conform, be normal? Put up with your domineering control, your invasion of my personal space, your disregard for all that's decent. I'm out of control after a life of doing what I 'should'.
“Brothers, I wanted to convey my message, and warn my people that this is prohibited, shameful, and inappropriate. It points to stupidity in the treatment of others, and ignorance of what Islam obliges us to do about this.”
” I j-just wanted y-you to come so y-you could c-comfort me . . ” he stated.
I'm still in here, ya know.
Web Counters
Tonight, I was having second thoughts about running (it was raining). But I decided to just do it - I've discovered it's much nicer, in some ways, to run in the rain. Once I was in my running gear my brain kept on thinking about this right-footed thing. Not wanting to totally embarrass myself in my street, I had a couple of little practices in the hallway.
Maybe they should pay him a royalty.
fruit He expects you to bring forth in season. There are people He
I wasn't sure about the cars at the bottom and I though maybe the flowers were too big but ahhh
As for what I was working on last night, it's just a monogram for a Harry Potter costume. Hopefully I'll remember to take photos to show you when it's sewn.
After some consideration I have come to the conclusion that there are at least two main reasons why the cheerleaders for interracial coupling are so much fonder of the black man/white woman combo than they are of the virtual taboo of depicting interaction between black women and white men.
Cut a length of fishing line (I varied the lengths of line by a bit, but all are roughly 2.5'-3'). Tie a loop at the top for easy hanging on tree branches. Space out the Christmas balls however you desire and knot on the length of fishing line. You absolutely can't mess this up!
Her Majesty went tee-tee on the potty today.
Note that the symbols for fire and air are triangles that represent the phalice or male entity. The symbols for water and earth are upside down triangles that represent the chalice or female entity.
they got scared.
Fragrance
The journalist is not very knowledgeable about children's books, saying that "40 years ago, no one had to contend with young-adult literature because there was no such thing." Maybe it's her Maths that is off, because I make that 1971, the year before my first book was published. No such thing as young adult literature? It wasn't called that and it might not all have been "dystopian" but it was certainly there.
i am older than you were when you died. by four years. if you had lived you would be just a little younger than my grandpa. i can vaguely imagine your face, wrinkled and smiling. i wonder what your life would have been like. i assume you would have married, had children, grandchildren by now. somewhere, someone loved you. and you ended some of their dreams when you went down.
We like to help people because are in trouble, they need help very much, so I like to help them, and it’s very kind to help who in trouble.
Sharks, on the other hand, were mostly her friends.
Projecting the focused timing
I'm off to experience Friday (and this beautiful March weather)! I pray you have a joy-filled Friday too!
When he saw his computer, he thought of his task
Its unusual name is believed to be derived from 'spital' - a corruption of the word 'hospital' that is quite commonly found in UK place names (for example Spitalfields) - and 'tongues', meaning outlying pieces of land. Edward I gave two such 'tongues' of land to the St Mary Magdalene Hospital - hence 'hospital tongues' and eventually 'Spital Tongues'.
Sometimes it is hard to tell if the mocker is operating from a feeling of genuine superiority, or if he is compensating for low self-esteem. The bully on the playground who pushes little kids around is not tough; he is more afraid than most of the kids he pushes around. He has just learned how to use his size to advantage by intimidating others. Stand up to the bully one time and he’ll usually back down and leave you alone. The mocker is just a bully with words. He pushes and shoves verbally. Don’t engage him at his game. The best means of derailing the mocker is by staying calm in his presence. Sometimes the mocker can be reached simply by asking him/her, "Why do you do that to others?" If they are carrying around a lot of hurt in their hearts, they may be seeking attention in the only way they know how.
Okay this goes along with everything else in the bottoms department. You will have this in your bathroom in the hospital (I hope. If not you are in a crappy hospital for sure!) Every time you now pee/poop you will have to rinse your parts with some room temp. water. These things aren't necessarily the easiest to use but you will want it. Remember to take it home with you. Or if you are sure you will forget, buy one before and have it ready in the bathroom.
* Papers - Hot Off The Press
This is not what I want my life to look like…
The ladies and I have crossed the street, still heading north, and are now on a newer section of the path, still the Jordan River Parkway. The river looks almost wild here and you don’t realize how close to the city you are. Russian Olive trees are not native to Utah and there is a movement afoot, more activism, to eradicate them. Personally I find them beautiful, especially in a riparian situation, and I hope this movement fails.
We were very happy for two years. I was going to uproot my life and move to his city. I had gotten the ok from my job to allow me to move and set up an office in our new home. We had passed our premarital counseling with flying colors, until one day he started to change and became more and more distant. I put the deposit down on the dress. The dress was awesome. My goregous shoes still sit high on a shelf in a closet, unworn. My dear friends planned, then quietly canceled showers and parties.
It is critically important that Burton reinforces this idea at the film’s end; Alice has come back to Earth from post-apocalyptic Underland and convinces Lord Ascot, her father’s old would-be business partner, that she’s got a daring, bold plan to make them money, and he takes her on as an apprentice. The film’s final scene is Alice boarding a ship, bound for China, where she’ll be the first to open trade with that nation. (More in a moment.) Only one character that we’ve seen comes with her, and that is Absolem (the blue hookah-smoking caterpillar that comes to her now as a blue butterfly; voiced by Alan Rickman). Absolem is the only character in the film who’s primary involvement with Alice is to get her to realize her own potential.
"Morning all what are we up to?" Comes a nasal and constipated voice. Great Jay has decided to venture to the commoners.
Okay, confession time: I am not into poetry…like, at all. Music, yes. Written poetry, no. It’s just not my thing. I’m a prose person.
He does not have the cheek to state who will be the directors of the company, but we can guess. (It will be) himself, his family and selected toadies.
This cute little turquoise and silver cup was the only one I could find but he was only 25 cents so I thought I could make a candle out of him!
Mare51089: i won't
When our busy 2+ days in Portland were up, we picked up a rental car and headed east towards Mt. Hood and the Columbia River gorge -- good decision. Again, great scenery and great beer was enjoyed. We stopped at Full Sail for lunch and was able to get a few pub exclusive beers and a nice view of the Columbia River.
Furthermore, if it were the intention of the Legislature to fix the time at which Commonwealth Act No. 671 would cease in its operation as of the date when the President could file his report before Congress when it first convened not in special session but in regular session, it would have expressly and unequivocally said so. In its other acts of delegation of powers when the legislature wanted to have the report of the President at its regular session, it expressly and explicitly said so. In section 3 of Commonwealth Act 494, in section 5 of Commonwealth Act 496, in section 6 of Commonwealth Act 498, in section 3 of Commonwealth Act 500 and in section 4 of Commonwealth Act 600, the National Assembly provided that the President shall report to the National Assembly within ten days after the opening of the next regular session of the said Assembly of whatever acts have been taken by him under the authority of those Acts. The Assembly left nothing for interpretation or speculation. In section 3 of Commonwealth Act 671, however, the same Assembly has not specified the kind of session before which the President should make his report. It merely said that upon the convening of the Congress the President shall report thereto all the rules and regulations promulgated by him. We should make no distinction where the law makes or calls for none. Here again, to support the majority opinion would require reading into the law, section 3 of Act 671, something that is not there.
Having a mouth that can sometimes get me into trouble, not to mention having to deal with the idiots that torment me on a daily basis....I thought I needed a great theme song.
to positive feedback?
Let’s call one side “the more grace people.” These were keen to argue that none can perform the works of the kingdom without the empowerment of “grace.” The “less grace people” kept saying “Yeah, but, c’mon. Commands are there. Loads of them. Stop sidelining half the Bible!”
* Grab a bottle of the colorless blender solution. You'll be refilling your marker. You can also put some in a spray bottle to play with.
Keith was prone to encouraging the villagers to occasional acts of violence, usually against the gypsies whom he hated with a passion. No one quite knew where the strength of his feelings came from. The gypsies were a problem, to be sure. But, Keith always seemed to make it personal. Despite his moodiness, he was often a big help to running the village. The young girls were crazy about him, but he never seemed to notice.
We’ve been seeing them since mid-March, but after a few weeks when they seemed a little scarce, it was surprising to see such large numbers of them.
Another early person was Mindy, one of the most nicest people I ever met.
As I was keeping very busy teaching the classes, Daved had lots of time to sit and be still. There were times it appeared that he was doing nothing, and for the most part, that was kind of true. But as I watched him be still, I called to mind something Rick Roberts had said during the recent CZT seminar: To pay attention to what is NOT there: the open space. Very often it is the stillness and not doing, that brings us to see the next step to take.
The Small Object Of Desire is settled into her new house and it's started to feel like a home (leastways, she's leaving her socks in the dining room). It's a nice Victorian terraced house; discussing it the other day we found we'd both come to the conclusion that it was like an old auntie. Much beloved and slightly disreputable in her way.
I hit rock bottom today, well I've been sitting here trying to ignore my financial situation all week. I currently have $75.00 in my checking account, minus the $22 I spent last night on a few groceries and cat food. So more like $53.00. I have around $1000.00 in savings a couple dollars more.
I've come to accept I may never again be a size six, but that being healthier and happier are still good and achievable goals.
I bagged up the remainder
How teary eyed I get over everything. Reading a magazine article at breakfast will have me crying in my Cheerios. Those Hallmark commercials about the recordable storybooks that were everywhere at Christmas made me weep.
I'm excited for a few blogs that are hanging out in the hopper waiting to be updated and posted.
I really loved some of the necklaces and I will hopefully get to a store sometime in the upcoming week. What did you think of Betsey Johnson?
Other - Stickles, copics
Thank you all who guessed! We love seeing photos of Zipfizz traveling around the world. If you have any cool pictures you can email them and we may use your picture in another contest! As always, post your pictures to our Facebook also!
Don’t give in
But...my husband came into the picture. He's the type of guy that would camp in his back pasture every other weekend just for fun. He even donned an infamous red and black flannel jacket for several years (until we got married and it secretly disappeared). But alas, after 4 and a half years of convincing me that tent camping could be fun, I caved. And I'll admit, I had a good time and learned a few lessons along the way. So for all of you under-qualified camper-people I give you...
Happy NaNoing!
Serve with a generous sprinkle of powdered sugar and your favorite syrup. Enjoy!
If I'm home, I brew a pot (2.75 cups) of Peet's Scottish Breakfast or Russian Caravan. Both are very heavy on the smokey Lapsang Souchang. If I am out, and I can actually get over to a Peet's, I have a cup of their Chai Latte (which should just be called Chai, because it should all have milk, but whatever...) It's strong and spicy and...wow! What they prepare is a combination of brewed tea and some kind of concentrate. You can't make this at home.
One of my favorite things about hosting a linky party is featuring a talented and crafty blogger. I know how excited I was, the first time I was featured on a blog!
Lot’s to do today. First stop; Coffee Town. “Waffle?” the waiter asked. “No! I’m saving it for the wing festival downtown.” I sat and read the news, drinking my coffee. After a while it was time. TIME FOR WINGS!
ZACH: I just don’t see any reason to go on. Life has no meaning for me, I can’t enjoy the company of my lover, my friends or my family…
This is but a glimpse of the pages full of amazing photos of a place that could have been lost. The day after the book signing, we, in California, were watching television in horror as many homes in the Santa Barbara area were lost to the tragic fires a couple of weeks ago. In corresponding with Diane, it was determined that none of the homes in the book were affected. But the danger for this to happen in the future is very real. This book becomes a treasure as it celebrates the beauty of the elegant and authentic architecture of Santa Barbara.
Esther 3:15 The posts went out, being hastened by the king’s commandment, and the decree was given in Shushan the palace. And the king and Haman sat down to drink; but the city Shushan was perplexed.
Amongst the various items on last nights BBC2 Newsnight was a report by Nick Bryant on racial violence in Australia, aimed at Indian students. It appears that there have been at least 97 reported attacks on students from the sub-continent who are studying in Australia, which has resulted in demonstrations by Asian students demanding that the government take action to halt the violence.
Lol this was a post I wrote a couple weeks ago, which I forgot to publish and just thought I had to share! :)
Duuudes you have no idea what happened to me. This is so damn funny, I have to share.
Britain’s Consumer Price Index (CPI), a major gauge for inflation, will reach 2.8 percent this year and drop to 2.1 percent next year.
Jack (6 years 10 months): Jack was a good eater, especially at buffets. Asked how he was doing as he was leaving Sweet Tomatoes, he replied, “A burp about now would be good.” (#288)
If we truly understand that it’s God’s perogative in that we are even saved and know Him, I think our approach in apologetics would be a lot more humble towards those who do not believe.
It is difficult to know exactly what is happening. I would imagine this will be up for discussion around the US-China talks if not a part of the talks themselves. But, I’m not sure!! I don’t believe the US will “wash its hands” of Chen.
Laughing to the resounding beats
hw_test: don't know If tested for heartworm or results.
The system was networked to other laboratories worldwide, where similar systems were operating. Our small ballistic lab in KwaZulu/Natal soon found itself competing with huge laboratories in the USA and other countries. In record time we were recording the highest “Hit Rate” in the world. A “Hit” occurred the moment we managed to identify that a specific bullet or cartridge case found on one shooting scene was linked to exhibits found on another scene.
 Save stickered receipts and drop them into the jar located in your school’s office.
The buffalos then sniffed the day-old carcass inquisitively and kept an eye on the lions, with one buffalo bull particularly annoyed at their presence and he chased them a couple of times, before the lions would half-heartedly chase them back. This little game went back and forth for some time, but the lions, being so well fed, were not intent on doing anything more than staying out of trouble, and made no effort to attack the herd; but I wonder if they didn’t have a kill how different their reaction would have been?
Do you have any goals for April? I’d love to hear them?
From one Oscar winner to another, Halle Berry is stunning in this sparkly tuille fest by Marchesa. She just commands your attention. Although I found her a bit too much during the In Memorium segment talking about Lena Horne.
The ACM Interim position statement was endorsed by the regulatory authority prior to its release to the midwifery profession for comment. Having been endorsed, the Position Statement on Homebirth comes under the midwifery Safety and Quality Framework which details the requirements with which a privately practising midwife must comply in order to be exempt from requiring insurance for providing intrapartum care for homebirths. Under the national law,
so as you might be able to gather i started this post on Sunday but good ole google chrome was having a spac for me so its taken til now and goin back to plain ole google to get this up..
“I’m a romantic. I write poetry about cars, I sing to them and talk to them just like a girlfriend. I know what’s in my heart and I have no desire to change.”
Standing at the entrance to the City Hall with an ANC flag on his shoulder, Faku said the party was celebrating an "important battle that is between the ANC and the media".
But that was before parents were spoon-fed fear-mongering media pieces that emphasized the exceptional while ignoring the ordinary. The CDC, in 2001 reported that: "Thirty years ago, the sight of children walking or biking to school was common. In fact, nearly 90% of children who lived within a mile of school used active transportion (i.e., walking or bicycling) as their primary mode of travel. In recent years, the rate of active transport has declined dramatically." By 2005 the CDC reported, "Today, fewer than 15% of children and adolescents use active modes of transportation.
Things I haven't written about but should have/thought about it:
118And if I lose thy love, I lose my all.
In my opinion, the never-ending onslaught of personal attacks, lies, and name-calling coming from the Left has severely damaged the cause of the conservative movement, especially on the Millennial front. For a generation with the attention span of a goldfish and the critical thinking skills of a four-year old, name-calling and political labels can be quite attractive. What young conservative hasn’t been accused of being a homophobe, a xenophobe, or an Islamophobe by fellow peers?
I commit myself to prove mathematically that it is possible to have a world that is best for all if only we decide to let go of the fear and limitation that we believe is who we are
The covers were made with grey board and I covered them with paper that I'd coloured with evergreen bough, tumbled glass, worn lipstick and vintage photo Distress ink. I used the evergreen bough to stamp images over the covers. The bird house was stamped with Coffee Archival ink and coloured with felt tips, the tiny birds were stamped with black ink.
Strain the strangers with the sinister hue of the shadow
Johnson Gym
Thanks for stopping by! Today is very exciting! Those of you who have been followers for a while now know that I was on my very first DT last year. The Scrappin' Chics DT. Well that DT is no longer, we have gone ahead and revamped it. We are now the Craftin' Chics DT. Thank you to the owner, Jenn Roseman for taking the initiative! I am co-owner and I am VERY excited to show you all the project themes we have scheduled and showing you what amazing talent we have from our DT!
There was a fifty-fifty chance Osama bin Laden was in the Pakistani compound Seal Team Six raided a year ago. During his deliberations on the raid President Obama received mixed messages from his National Security team with Vice President Biden advising against the raid. Mr. Biden recently stated:
Then you have to let the Viva dry/cure, I let mine sit for a few days. Make sure to have them lay flat to dry.
James Murdoch is described as exhibiting a “lack of curiosity … wilful ignorance even” at the time of the negotiations surrounding the 2008 Gordon Taylor phone-hacking settlement and into 2009 and 2010. The younger son of Rupert Murdoch is criticised for failing to appreciate the significance of the News of the World hacking when the “for Neville” email first became public in 2009 and during subsequent investigations by parliament in February 2010 and a New York Times report in September 2010.
Some race to win. Others race to survive.
J E T S ~ Just Enjoy The Signings
I inhale sharply, frozen for a second.
Here is Tina and me on her last day.
Dating is no exception. The minimum date fare is a coffee or a drink, and often a steak dinner, with drinks. And appetizers. And dessert. Many go out on dates at least once a week, turning into months and even years. Tradition dictates that the man pays. In return he often doesn’t even get a “thank you,” not to mention anything more tangible.
The result is very neat, and very right-angled. My husband keeps saying that he thinks he could get socks on more easily if the angle were gentler, and I’m thinking of trying a Sweet Tomato heel for him.
some kind of mutual admiration pact, Prince and Bush share some
8) Return to the guy in picture 1 and he thanks you for all your help in this. Ships are now being sold! He says to be sure to have the 4 required ship items! If you have been following this guide down and in order, you should have 3 of the 4 required items. He offers to make the missing item for you in exchange for:
20. RE:Defininition ft. Mos Def
Some influential supporters would not wait any longer for us to make inferences of their character. ANC youth leader Julius Malema is threatening the Constitutional Court with promises to die for Zuma. Not to worry, don't take me literally he avers.
In the first year of running peonylim.blogpost she has been featured in The Sunday Times Style, Grazia, ASOS Magazine, Tatler, Lucky, Glamour USA and The LFW Daily. Additionally online she has been seen on Harpers Bazaar, Grazia IT, Vogue USA, Italia, Japan and China, Style.com, New York Magazine and many more.
Praise the LORD, I tell myself,
TUES. NOV. 8 AT 1P. $26 (FULL)
Brown Barts beanie from last year
Into the mouth of Hell
The Old Bakery
I think the first one to make me laugh out loud was
Brian and I sat down a week ago and organized my thoughts, to-do lists, and business plans on note cards, then on a calendar. I don't have to think about what to do, and my second challenge this year is to stick to the schedule.
‘He butters them all up. He’s a businessman so can speak their language.’
This week has been insanity, which didn't leave much time for anything else other than reading a few blog posts while waiting to pick my kids up from school.
4- The top of my barn is filled with chess sets that my husband promises will not move with us again!
It was at this point I realized that I truly had no idea what he was talking about.
According to the figures, 90% of people are aware of the existence of alcoholic ‘units’ but an astounding 107% of people are unable to specify what this translates to in the glass. This is, of course, bullshit. We all know a unit is about three measly sips of Tesco value wine, or an eighth of a pint, or something equally unrealistically tiny. So we have entered into a mass deception to fool the authorities whereby units are a complete mystery, and we can thereby continue getting absolutely slashed with a squeaky clean conscience.
So here's a photo of some of the paper dolls I've made. They are fun to do but we, the gals I've been trading with, have decided to take a hiatus from them for awhile. The mirror in my embossing room (bathroom!) is covered with them!
Knowing what direction to go, that’s a must.
“African American and Hispanic dolls are the first to go. They fly off the shelves quicker than we can restock or order more. Out of 10 boxes shipped, only 2 have dolls for minorities. ”
Meanwhile, terrorist enclaves on Israel's borders — Hezbollah in the north, Hamas in the south — aim tens of thousands of missiles at Israeli cities. And the Iranian regime, whose declared goal is the destruction of Israel, is moving ever closer to nuclear capability.
To demonstrate all of this, I would like to offer a definition of credit union business development: “The art of developing sustainable and meaningful relationships with local businesses, the credit union’s community, and existing and potential members with the goal of increasing the credit union’s viability and its visibility to local business and the community at large.”
Okay, so no reading tonight. Instead, head on over to the GalaxyCast Webpage and check out the latest episode of GalaxyCast – #27. As always, help sponsor our host website by checking back with the 2 Guys Talking Podcast Network on a regular basis. Tomorrow, we’ll be discussing part 2 of Chapter 18 of “Star Wars – Medstar II: Jedi Healer, A Clone Wars Novel” by Michael Reaves and Steve Perry.
here is the link
The reason for this post is I thought you might like to see J’s hat. His Christmas party hat that is, made for him by his teachers and (after a lot of persuasion) glittered by J. J hates anything on his head, so his willingness to wear this item has amazed us. At the moment he’s seeking it out two or three times a day and whilst it doesn’t stay on for long, he’s clearly getting a kick out of wearing it!!
Dutch Gap is a wildlife area on the James River, where there was a large oxbow. Over time, humans cut a channel (left) to shorten the distance to transport materials by boat, and the river has rerouted itself a bit, leaving lots of rich wetlands spread over the area. It is a really interesting area to explore, even on a very hot day that felt more like early August than early May. I did the full circuit hike here some time back, which you can read about here.
Rather, the programs are essentially pay-as-you-go schemes. (What little surplus the trusts did accumulate was used to fund other government programs such that nothing’s been saved[1].) Operating this way has two terrible consequences. First, because funds aren’t saved and invested, they don’t generate returns. Thus there’s no compounding effect for any of the money that’s been withheld. Second, for every year that the programs are in existence, their total future liabilities increase.
As we approach the holidays, a time when I am never sure how much time I am going to have on my hands to indulge in the secondary and tertiary life things, I wanted to take the opportunity to post about something I probably don’t do enough of; gratitude for the people I have the pleasure of being around a game table rolling dice with, bullshitting with, arguing with, and for the love of Mike getting actual quality gaming in with. This post is for the people at my sessions who put up with me and my wingding style, and keep coming year-in, year-out. This bud’s for you, bitches (who mostly don't even read this blog, so I feel safe calling them "bitches").
I finished my work at the office and we took an auto home, but not before she took my camera and shot pictures of me in front of places which she heard were meaningful to me in the stories I told her.
Of your eyes.........
trained and proficient in my warrior tasks and drills.
This is presented almost as a public service, i.e. by keeping arguments out of the minutes, the decision becomes more easily readable. But again there’s nothing in Rule 124 to support this practice and policy. Would it not be possible to fulfil both the letter and spirit of Rule 124 by writing complete minutes, and then if necessary cutting and pasting (or providing a synopsis of) those crucial points
A couple of days later, I was introduced to my African American niece, nephew and more cousins. Who knew I even had them? I certainly didn’t! I learned about what schools they attend, what languages they study, what sports they like, what goals they have in life. Phone numbers and e-mail addresses were exchanged. There was laughter, tear-soaked eyes and hugs that felt more and more natural.
I recommend it for: Lovers of classics and romantic novels.
A month later
Reflecting, ‘I will not let this happen next year,’ I conjure how one could impress and wow a dinner table with new conversation, but without the pretentious perception of expensive wine. Bring beer!
I said to Dave, "Ya know...Jake having his job at the library is no accident. He has always LOVED libraries, and even this particular job within the library is perfect for him because he doesn't want to deal with the public."
Third suggestion: I want an actual cocktail to taste. (okay, more reasonably, a sample of the cocktail for sipping). The class sampled the drinks with straw tastings. I assume this is more to manage stock than for hygiene purposes, since many of the class members sucked the end of their straws and then double-dipped. I personally don't get squeemy sharing a cocktail glass, so I wasn't freaked by this (although it is a bit gross when you think about it too much). But, I'd just rather have my own sample to drink.
Well, the effect was predictably instant, shocking and unstoppable. The involuntary roar came first, which clearly shocked Clint and Sally, but it was when I fell and expelled a volley of angry brown feculence from each trouser leg that Clint suffered his first heart attack. (The other two were just tremors, really.) As always, it was quite something to behold - like Jackson Pollock having a particularly expressive outburst in an oxtail soup factory.
Well, another House hearing on Solyndra came and went this morning. In another Great Moment Of Transparency in the Age of Obama, the Solyndra execs took the Fifth as promised. The Democrats’ erstwhile chief inquisitor and witch hunter of Capitol Hill, Henry Waxman, demonstrated his trademark chutzpah by complaining that the GOP was “badgering witnesses” by having them invoke the 5th.
Disappointingly, my increasingly sore knee meant our plans for an overnight expedition to Taroko Gorge National Park never came to be. Instead, after a rest day in Hualien, we took a day trip up.
Jetbikes---Vypers---Fire Prism
Here is a sneak preview of the cover art by Cian Flynn,Sligo,Ireland.
For week 11 I decided to concentrate on letting my calf heal without giving up too much mileage. I rested Saturday by not going on trail with the Harriers and just walking a couple of miles. I totally rested Sunday, and skipped my run on Monday. By then my calf was MUCH better but I figured I would benefit more from resting than running 5 miles. Tuesday It felt great so I went on my 8 miler. I decided to take it very slow, plenty of walk breaks, and do some trail scouting so I was up and down hills, through the woods, and around town. It made for an incredibly slow average, but my calf was no worse so I considered it a success.
First up: The Good! (or at least the not bad!)
Kevin Carter (1960 – 1994) was an award-winning South African photojournalist and member of the ‘Bang-Bang Club,’ a collective of war photojournalists Kevin Carter, Greg Marinovich, Ken Oosterbroek, and Joao Silva.
So, my message here today is, he is likely stinging hot mad at me right now for things he DID or reactions provoked of his own accord and while he has wished me dead when I got home from Ontario in 2009 (he said he wished the plane crashed) and wished me dead when I came home from a major surgery from hospital in 2007 (he said he wished I died in hospital) so I’m guessing he’s still wishing me good and dead.
$1.99 Dried Fruit (Sun Maid Prunes, Raisins, SunSweet Apricots) 13 to 16 oz. – with in-ad coupon – limit 3
We had a list a mile long of places to eat.
The other night we were at the kitchen table after dinner. Jackson had been having some ear problems (swimmers ear) and we had to put drops in his ear each morning and night. I had just finished putting the drops in his ear when Addison walked up.
After our birthday lunch we climbed up and down on Buren's rock candy like blocks (it's allowed) ... snapped ourselves silly.... crunched our way over the gravel... wove in and out through the clipped-to-perfection trees before doing a lap of the boutiques and restaurants... Every year the boutiques in Le Palais Royal become more of a temptation... serious restraint is called for... except at the Serge Lutens perfume boutique... that is not allowed... (the samples they so generously give keep my travel bag happy for months...)
In the meantime, here's a little photo essay for you...
Less alcohol, more acidity; the Australian consumer’s taste has also changed over the years. In a tight market, this evolution has made some room for wines developed in a cooler climate on the heights of the Canberran region.
Even before I got my kindle, I usually didn’t buy hardcovers; paperbacks are lighter, cheaper and take up less space. The fit easily in my bag.
Overall, though, this was a great dinner. I’m glad Chef Santos is doing events like this, and I’m glad City Grit hosted — it was a very good idea all around, and it was executed very well to match.
2010.08.21 Ethiopia Addis Ababa 0 1 A popular church leader is brutally assaulted by Muslims with wooden clubs.
The sound on the '75 show is pretty rough, but obsessives will want it for all the unique songs. The other auds here are pretty ok - nothing to write home about, but certainly listenable. If you're a hardcore fan, you want all of this. More casual folks should maybe just start w/the '76 Chicago and '80 Berkeley shows, and then see where that takes you.
for youse ideas i'll match youse
Thanks for the nice comments last week. I got my dad back here and they are doing a ton of tests...mainly, he's 98 and things are just wearing out but his mind is as sharp as ever!
-You can roll over both ways, but HATE to be on your tummy.
Is the weight of the world upon you
FYI: I received this book free from Tyndale House Publishers as part of their book review bloggers program. I was not required to write a positive review. The opinions I have expressed are my own.
Here is a brief tutorial on how I achieved the card:
While the pudding is setting up for that 2 minutes, poke holes in the cake with the end of a wooden or plastic spoon. Put the holes all over the cake about an inch apart. I ended up going back through and adding more in between the rows since I spaced the holes a little too far apart. You can really do however many you want, but the more holes the better for this cake!
At 5 p.m. today I will have completed fourteen weeks of unemployment. Although I've had three interviews in that time I've got nowhere near getting a job, not being invited back for second interviews. I'm guessing I was too old and too experienced for the jobs, they wanted some keen young thing to concentrate on a few repetitive tasks all day long. I can do that. Gizza job!
I am not JOB and i really can’t see a silver lining through this. So don’t blame me for the cranky behavior or rude remarks, abusive words, mood swings, tantrums or the desire to be left alone. Respect it and let me be. Sick or not i am a pathetic host…so to all the unwanted guests goodbye. I don’t mean to be rude when i don’t look at you and smile or show any signs of recognition…that’s me being me. I don’t like making sweet and forced conversations, that’s it!
So while I’m not knocking the idea overall, it ain’t for me. Besides, in the last six months I completed a triathlon and half-marathon while enduring what I now recognize as an epic Crohn’s flare. Didn’t puke once.
Don't worry.
Representatives of four breweries gathered at WEST in Glasgow yesterday evening for a beer tasting as part of Social Media Week. Moderated by Pete Brown, the tasting was intended both to introduce new-wave beer to a wider audience and to discuss the value of social media to breweries and drinkers.
San Diego Rock 'n Roll Marathon - 6/5/05 - 4:44:29
Something was missing last time we visited the farm. It was my dad's (via his dad) old Mack truck. I'm not too sentimental. It was sitting and rotting for years, and the guy who bought it will most likely restore it or use it's parts to restore another beautiful vintage Mack.
What is the flu?
Go to the Services page to find out more about what we can do for your book.
ring out the bells again
“What holds you back from joy?” In other words, what prevents you from living the abundant life Jesus promised? I know for me, it’s been lingering too long on the past. Of course it’s good to seek healing for the past, but once that has started, sometimes we can spend too much time there, getting stuck.
Jake and I have a lot to do this weekend. We're going down to the condo and cleaning it before turning it over to the property manager. We also have some water softener people coming over Saturday afternoon to test our water and just for letting them come over they're giving us a free case of water bottles and free lunch at Olive Garden, so you know I couldn't turn that down! And hopefully we will be 90% or more complete with Jaxon's nursery by the end of this weekend. I really hope we can get everything put away in the house this weekend too because I'm tired of looking at boxes everywhere. I also have to find a dress to wear for the Marine Corps Ball that's taking place Nov 10! I know Jake is thrilled to be going with me to do that. ;)
Let me quickly sum up my feelings of art shit: It's fucking awful. So little of this drivel is worth looking at for more than (and I'm being generous here) 2 seconds that I'd rather spend the time drinking root beer. And root beer is the most vile substance on this planet (concentrated cat urine is a more palatable alternative than root beer).
Should I make the "What is This?" a puzzle?
Soggy chips discarded, plastic bags
All in all, Hawaii was good to us. I don't know how many more trips I can take without my Larry but I'm grateful he allows me to spend time with my friends, even if it is on a tropical island thousands of miles away. And despite all the fun, he's a hard one to be apart from. Thanks to him, I was happy to come home. And thanks to my dad and Jammy Jam, I had a blast.
Discover a new way. A better way.
- The love of friends and family.
“Those colonial soldiers who were patrolling the street. They’re gone.”
-In order to implement this strategy you’ll need a silenced weapon. Play with Engineer or Recon class with the VSS. The motion sensors will avoid you getting surprised.
But, when trying to make a decision,
I handed him a note to give to the judge. The bailiff took me away as my lawyer presented my note to his Honor. I turned and listened as he read it aloud for the record.
Since it's the last week of the month, we like to mix things up and focus on non-traditional sized cards, so we've given you a Round or Square option. Try a round card, a square card or both if you're feeling really inspired!!
Once again, only corporate profit counts and people as well as the environment are of no importance. And the neocon puppets are playing the game with great gusto.
For a minute, I thought that the other kids would think it was silly that she was handing out pennies or dimes. I hurried her along and got to church and she went her way and I went mine. I teach a Sunday School class for tweens. As Sunday School started, I took up offering. I was just about to seal the envelope when one of the tweens that comes to church alone says "Wait a minute Ms. Julia...I have offering." She reached in her purse and groped around until she pulled out a dime. She smiled and said "Nevaeh gave me this before church."
If Talk Be Bothersome To Ye...
CR: Well, I guess as every parisian girl, I got a lot of virtues :-) Tough question. I'd say I'm organized, curious, positive (almost gung-ho), fascinated by human-being, and open-minded. Or ... maybe that's just the virtues I wish I had ! And about writing in particular, I hope I'm quite easy to read, informative and funny.
Morpheus Road is about a teen named Marshall Seaver and the amazing events that happen to him in one week. Ya, you heard me...one week. It all started with him and his dad getting into an argument and he breaks one of his mother's gifts. Then it begins, he gets haunted by a drawing that he drew himself which he named Gravedigger. All Marshall wanted was a happy summer, but his best friend Cooper gets into some trouble with the police and soon ends up missing. So Marshall goes looking for him and tries to figure out why he is being haunted. Altogether this makes a fantastic adventure with tense excitement and creates a strong curiosity within me to find out what comes next in the book!
"We heard you had a problem with our boss."
Well Mom, asks the farmboy. What are we doing today?
And told him I was fine. I picked myself up... started running... and then started sobbing as the blood started running down my leg...
awake me in warm fragrances drifting in with natures music
Back our campaign to support family and friends carers: Keep Families Together.
This was the offering which in his compassion the only Son of God would make of himself in his human nature for our sake.
Before I knew it a year passes with no light at the end of the tunnel. I was going to give up my dream. A friend of mine works at a television production company and he told me that I should apply to go to the workshops that are held at the Edinburgh TV festival which are taught by industry professionals. It was free and you learn a lot in 3 days. I listened to him and applied but like my previous job applications I was rejected. I was beginning to feel down in the dumps, until I received an email from the people from the Edinburgh TV festival advertising a fairly expensive 3 day course in London giving an insight of how the industry works and how to get into the TV industry from the eyes of industry professionals. After much deliberation I decided to participate this course.
4. You must follow my blog. (RSS feed or Google friend connect, bonus entry is you do both!) Please state how you follow. I will check. If you use RSS feed, make sure you confirm subscription. Please post a 2nd comment for Bonus entry
From acclaimed author Laurie Halse Anderson comes this compelling, impeccably researched novel that shows the lengths we can go to cast off our chains, both physical and spiritual.
I met Kate Feld in Manchester for tea and dippy eggs yesterday. Kate is the brain behind the Manchester Blog Awards, among many other things. We chatted, as you'd expect, about blogs and blogging. I've been working with beginner bloggers a lot more than I used to and recently taught a workshop on Blogging for Beginners to a creative writing group in Ormskirk, West Lancashire.
as those dull stones
the sinister curl of his lips
I was too preoccupied with how I was going to do my job............
Or, if you took stock performance data from poorly performing Company “A” and spliced on better performing stock data from Company “B”, and then made a new graph and used that graph to sell investors on Company “A”, the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) would have a veritable “cow” when they found out, wouldn’t they? People go to jail for such things.
Also, I felt that it was appropriate for me to get drunk. We had won. I don’t care about the consequences, sport had won. But, I digress…
Stephen Colbert: RU Tired of Republican Lies, Gaffes, Walk-Backs and Pivots? TYT: Fox News Scares Obama Admin – EPA Resignation Eddie Walters – ‘Leven Thirty Saturday Night (1930) Daily Scoop Xtra: Is Climate Change Hitting Home? “Can Obama Be Swifted-Boated?” Rick Santorum Will Show His True Soul by Endorsing Romney ($$$$) after Commenting on Mitt’s “Core” God Bless Michele Bachman…Politician…Sinner! Now she endorses Romney after waiting 4 months after he beat her. Credible???
Not sure who is more excited Ashley or her sisters ;)
What's your take? Do you instinctively compliment little girls' looks, too? What else do you talk about with little girls? Do you remember having smart conversations with adults when you were little? Do you have any young girls in your life to at the moment, or do you have a daughter? Will you take Lisa Bloom's pledge, too? (Think how amazing it would be if we all did this from now on!) Do you think it's important or not that big of a deal? I'm curious to hear your thoughts... xoxo
This has always been one of the things I’ve wondered about outwardly partisan liberals like Chait. Why, given the fallibility of the regulation, is it still pushed forward? And more generally, why is some regulation better than none? Chait is being quite disingenuous here, but I think his views aren’t far from those of the mainstream, which really scares me.
“Maybe,” Christopher started. “Maybe water can beat electricity.”
"Any legislation that addresses the desperation of dreamers and immigrant youth across the nation on a day-to-day basis is worth entertaining and may be worth pushing for," said Gaby Pacheco, 27, an undocumented Miami resident who came from Ecuador at age 8 and became a stellar student.
I know my divine origin; I’m from Zion, the city of the Living God. Therefore, I cannot be subject to the principle of this world’s system. I am a heavenly citizen, seated together with Christ Jesus in the Heavenly realms! Hallelujah! Amen!
Hazel Campana had a bad-news boyfriend, one Carlos Berrios. Berrios is recently free from a seven-year stint in prison and sports a teardrop tattoo next to his right eye. He was abusive, violently pulling Campana's hair in public if he felt cruelly inclined, which occured frequently.
(It was later renamed after a series of children's TV characters and most recently Rob Brydon, before being sold to a Saudi engineering student as a garage for his gold-plated vacuum bed.)
My fellow Queensland blogging buddy, Jos from Sew, Cook, Laugh & Live has come up with these Faux Vintage Lolly Jars. They're so cute Jos but I'm not sure its a good idea I have lollies on display like that. I have to hide them from myself. Be a great idea for an old fashioned lolly shop party. Thanks Jos for joining in and your wonderful ideas!
CB: “C’mon, that was back in 2006.” Turning to Intern, “What were you, 8?”
This bottling form cask is very straight forward. I use a "little bottler" connected to the cask tap. To make things as easy as possible I brought my floor capper into the utility room.
These past few months of Crossfit have probably been the most challenging for me, for a variety of reasons. A changed environment, for one. The ridiculous winter here, for another. And while I am tremendously happy to be coaching and helping other folks move forward in their respective Crossfit journeys, it has been very difficult to still prioritize my own training, especially while working a “regular “job, too. But I would say the biggest obstacle has been my own ego. I have been guilty of being overly concerned with other people’s numbers. I have not wanted to not beat my own scores. I have been hesitant to try going heavier even though I know I need to. I have been… afraid? A little unmotivated? Both?
Despite the raise on the interest on this band as Björk developed into an international music artist, the discography of Tappi Tíkarrass has never been reissued and all the original releases are widely unavailable.The band has appeared only in two Icelandic compilations, Satt 3 which was released in 1984 and featured two live B-sides: “Sperglar” and “Seiður”. Finally, by 1998 record label Spor released Nælur, another compilation which contained the songs “Iltí Ební” and “London”, both of them taken from Bítið Fast í Vítið.
or caught me , unaware, in the middle of a bad day......
Making not reservation of yourselves,
Coming now to the bits that I really loved about the book
Little Gareth could so easily imagine a grown man on a roaring bike flying over umpteen double deckers, or his own little (carpeted) mountain. And despite the crashes, spills and Evel being generally thrown off his bike in the most startling of bone-crushing ways, the hero would live to tell the tale and do it all over again just a few moments later.
Today, I am off to "Tuesday Crazies" at my friend Adella's house. This is my group of friends that connected over crazy quilting but everyone just brings their current project now. Mine is most often my stack of crazy quilting blocks because I never seem to be able to finish them. I'm on a mission, though, and those blocks will be finished by the end of this year. If I keep putting it in writing, it will happen. LOL! Have fun while I'm away. Leave that comment now................
The BTJA Executive Board includes: Michael Ausiello (TVLine), Joey Berlin (BFCA/BTJA), Debra Birnbaum (TV Guide Magazine), Jenna Busch (Zap2It.com), John De Simio (BFCA/BTJA), Michael Cidoni Lennox (Associated Press Television News), and Sam Rubin (KTLA-TV). The organization has 72 voting members.
I am fired from my job because I am so devastated and emotional I miss more work than I make it too....I move in with a roommate, get another job and just got fired from it...
The producer’s role is not limited to the recording studio. Ideally, a producer brings insight to the project’s songs long before recording starts. Many producers are talented arrangers and songwriters who can bolster your songs with their fresh ears. Similarly, producers have often been around the block a few times and have many helpful hints, or even connections, to help you promote your recording. For the indie recording artist, a producer is a good resource for guidance about publishing, mechanical royalties, performance rights, and referrals to the entertainment lawyers you will need.
So with no more further rants, I am going to the recipe. This is a very simple, easy to make Pulav in a short time, provided you have paneer in your fridge!
I guess we’re talking after Crassus, since he will be ahead by about 1,000 pages by the time I’m done with him. I guess I can’t say Colleen McCullough. Or Ray Stevens (he played Titus Pullo in HBO’s Rome). This is hard! I can’t go beyond Octavian, because all my research has been within a very narrow time frame, from 90 BCE to 20 BCE. Pompey, no – he was power hungry, but when he got it he couldn’t handle it. Cicero, no again. He was brilliant, but politically his principles and positions waffled more than _________ (enter the politician of your choice, from either party). So I’m going to go with Publius Crassus, Marcus’ son. In Gaul, Caesar trusted him to lead legions, conquer less than cooperative tribes, make political decisions, all without any help from the great general – at an age when today he’d just be getting out of grad school. Hail, Publius!
Fingers crossed things go as well tomorrow. xx
These would be nice with my Arabian Fig Jam too, if only we hadn’t eaten it all. Roll on summer and the glut of fresh figs, I can’t believe I don’t have any jam!
And each of us will continue adding on our little rings of experience until some unseen force chops us down and studies and dates our lives. And maybe one day the whole Earth itself may gather so many growth rings that it fills to capacity and simply bursts under the pressure of the wars and lives and births and extinctions and loves and storms and such that have accumulated to form history. It could happen.
Lots going on here as per usual but I have managed a
While lurking, and taking a brief hiatus from writing at CRN.info, I read this in the comments thread of another post: “This place is supposed to be the “Christian” blog…er…right?” Well, I can say: “Yes! It is.” We don’t always agree (sometimes we don’t really even like each other very much); we certainly do not all share the same ideas about theology or politics!, but at the end of the day, we still have enough nerve to love each other, correct each other, demonstrate grace to each other, and help one another carry the burdens of this life. This is why I cannot, even though I said I would, stay away for a week. Not only is writing my passion, but I love those I write with here and those who read. This place, as a microcosm of the church, is where I meet grace daily–no matter how badly a post is written or how many people take umbrage with it. Grace. Ahh…how did Annie Dillard write it? “One catches grace as a man fills a cup under a waterfall.”
I went to school with teens who had never seen cows. Few of my classmates drove, even in our senior year of high school, because their parents didn’t own cars. It was too cumbersome downtown. They knew everything about the city, and nothing about constellations, or flowers, or fresh-picked corn. They didn’t make snowmen because there were no yards. We didn’t ride bikes. Our lives were reduced to metal playgrounds and after school specials on TV.
It should also be remembered that Al Qaeda was created by the U.S. as a tool against the Soviets in Afghanistan in the 1980s. Now the U.S. seems to be going for the same mistake, arming a temporary ally that has all the prerequisites for turning its arms in an unpredicted direction.
I am not fond of Nemesis. I will get to why in a minute, but I am not alone. There was a profound lack of enthusiasm for the film. It premiered on Friday, December 13th 2002 (I am not a superstitious soul, by the way) behind Jennifer Lopez’s Maid in Manhattan. It was the only trek film to not premiere at number one at the box office. It wound up the lowest grossing trek film, earning a little less than $ 44 million.
And, hmmm, what else? Oh yeah, my blog went live for the first time on January 10, 2011!!
Today’s journal page that I created for my Scrap*Journal*Life class is from Proverbs 15:13
It’s rarely remembered these days that until quite recently, scientific research was mostly carried on by amateurs. The word “scientist” wasn’t even coined until 1833; before then, and for some time after, the research programs that set modern science on its way were carried out by university professors in other disciplines, middle class individuals with spare time on their hands, and wealthy dilletantes for whom science was a more interesting hobby than horse racing or politics. Isaac Newton, for example, taught mathematics at Cambridge; Gilbert White founded the science of ecology with his Natural History of Selborne in his spare time as a clergyman; Charles Darwin came from a family with a share of the Wedgwood pottery fortune, had a clergyman’s education, and paid his own way around the world on the H.M.S. Beagle.
Elbow Grease, Spackle and Pine Sol by Dale Watson & The Texas Two
Cards are split into several different types — basic resources (wood, stone, brick, ore), luxury resources (glass, silks, papyrus), trade buildings (which generally allow players to acquire resources from other players for cheaper), point cards (which simply score points), guild cards (which provide bonuses at the end of the game for certain specific cards), military cards (which represent a civilisation’s military strength in an abstract manner) and science cards. Science cards form the basis of the game’s most complex mechanic — collecting sets of the same type of “science” provides the player with points to the value of the number of cards squared, while collecting one of each of the three “science” symbols provides the player with a further 7 points.
Early this morning at 08:01, 13 envelopes bearing the Mersey Side Police logo landed simultaneously on 13 separate doormats to be read by the brave activists of the BNP, now known forever as the Liverpool 13.
Kinect games
Not only do I read, I also watch movies. There are some great films which deal with the era, (Sense & Sensibility, Pride & Prejudice, Persuasion, This Charming Man, Vanity Fair, Master & Commander, Becoming Jane, The Duchess) However, I've found that although these films have fabulous costumes and unbelievable cinematography, they do not all use dialogue from the era, which to me, lessens the film considerably.
i had a bad dream
The novel is done, and for now, so am I! It’s definitely a first draft, meaning that at 57,000 words it still needs about 15,000 more words to be a good book, ready for audience consumption. I’m going to let it cool off for the holidays, read a book or two. Then start in on the rewrites in January. I’m really looking forward to getting back to my normal blogging schedule of researched and polished articles of interest and entertainment, rather than my indulgent personal blather.
I'm joining the Kindergarten through 2nd grade linky party over at Kindergarten Lifestyle. There are a ton of blogs already linked and I can't wait to find more to explore. Check out the linky party by clicking on the image below. I hope you find some great new blogs!
Hope it does the same for you.
I think I knew Oregon was going to win. I think I even knew it would be by several touchdowns. That’s the rational part of me. The irrational part of me, the part that makes up well over ninety-nine percent of my being… that part said that 400 miles to drive on game day is nothing compared to the victory, the glory. Both parts were correct; it’s just that one was actually correct and the other still thinks the O’Dowd-Barkley fumbled snap cost USC the game, all the while ignoring Oregon literally running around in the Coliseum swerving back and forth as the Trojan secondary listened to ominous encores of Yakety-Sax and somehow the Ducks are lining up to snap the ball again even though they’re on defense and it’s a TV timeout and my god, is this the future?
Today was, in some ways, a step back for me - or it felt that way, at least. The compassion was hard to access today, the patience was stretched thinly, and the usual playful spring in my step was more like a dutiful clomp. As I sit here getting ready to say goodbye to another weekend, I'm trying to think of why the day went strange. Although it could be any number of things, I think I put my finger on it. And it's an old, familiar theme.
Centennial Ipa
The recently flooded regions of Kenya may be hit by water-borne diseases including UN health organizations have warned, urging for organized hygiene campaigns. The 2010 rainy season in Kenya, which is expected to last until late June/ early July, has already claimed 18 lives and affected the lives of more than 10,000 others. The worst affected areas are located in the northern, north-eastern and western regions of the country.
Then the next day I received this:
This year is off to a great start! First I should mention that last week we ended the year on some really nice rides. We had a couple dressage rides last week that were beautiful. Klein is really working long and low nicely at the walk and trot to warm up and cool down, transitions are seeing some improvement too. We also went exploring again in another new area and did another 7.5 mile conditioning ride with long trots and long canters.
Enough rambling from me today.
-Majlis Pertunangan Zaza & Shukri
How useful are wall mounts for LCD and Plasma TVs? Do I really need a TV stand or maybe a TV cabinet? Which TV accessories are appropriate for my room and how do I select the best accessories.
So, this was my craft project for the week. I´m typing this at home, on my Sofa, on a rainy tuesday, but I´m telling blogger to publish it on Saturday. So if you read this, I´m in Paris. I´ve never done this before, writing posts in advance and publishing them at some point later. Usually it´s write and hit over here, so, that´s an experiment for me :)
IDS, Lord Freud, Chris Grayling and Maria Miller proclaim at every opportunity that disabled people could compete in the job market on a level footing with non-disabled people if we really wanted to. The under-the-counter briefings to the tabloid attack-hacks preach that we’re all idle scroungers who have been trapped into a life of idleness for no other reason than the easy availability of benefits. I’m not sure whether that counts as yet more magical thinking, or just plain wishful thinking, because even before the WRB axe the benefit system pays a pittance of what I used to earn and the long term financial implications are frankly terrifying. Getting out of the house once a week, not speaking to anyone from one week to the next, watching the death spiral of two decades worth of savings and pension; not really a life I would choose for myself.
And what do the statements in the SDO scale say? As Jost & Thompson (2000) have pointed out, fully half of its items specifically ask people whether or not they accept social inequality (Sample items: "It would be good if all groups could be equal" and "We should strive to make incomes more equal"). But anyone who knows the first thing about politics will be aware that "equality" is a great mantra of the Left and that conservatives view the whole idea as absurd. Leftists believe that in some mystical way "all men are equal" and conservatives reject equality as an unattainable myth. Ever since the Pilgrim Fathers, attempts to found societies based on equality have quickly degenerated into pervasive and permanent INequality. So the SDO theory that conservatives reject equality is laughably unoriginal. So it is no wonder that the SDO scale predicts conservatism in other senses. Fully half of the items in the scale relate to what has always been a core conservative belief. The correlation between SDO and conservatism is then an "artifact" (a product of the research design, not new information about the world)
Some of his music is available online for purchase download, but not this album as far as I can tell.
unemployed population is a
If you really want to know I will share it with you. I’m sharing it here because I know that I cannot be the only one who was tired of living what I thought was the acceptable norm. I know that I could not have been the only one living mediocre and wanting something more. It’s not an easy pill to swallow, it takes guts, it takes strength. It takes being willing to
The narrative of Psyclone draws attention to the fact that DU affects not only civilians, noncombatants, in the country they’re used, but also, due to airborne dispersion, civilians in countries on the other side of the planet:
Two days ago, she ditched her piercings and bleached the black dye from her hair.
But wow!!! What a wonderful wonderful week!!!! Maiara was baptized on Sunday after Sacrament Meeting and it was a very beautiful and wonderful to watch. She is a very special young woman and has an amazing testimony...wow, it really amazes me how much faith and strength the youth that are being sent to the world right now have...they are definitely prepared by the Lord! Carol is another young woman that we are teaching who is the same! ...She´s 13 years old too and she is more hesitant about the church than Maiara was, mostly because she has been going to another church, Deus No Brasil, for many years and is even a leader there. But she is reading and praying about the Book of Mormon and wants to visit the church this Sunday and really has a desire to know if it is true. Both these young woman are amazing examples to me...they are full of faith and light and I love them both.....they remind me a lot of you, Megan! :)
The clue to the title of the book, too, is in this poem. In 1967, a group of protesting poets had lit a fire outside the headquarters of the Arts Council. put britain back was certainly topical but my favourite poem in the book is brown light, with its musical ending, in which "a flurry" of sandwiches:
His arrangements include the swing version of "Fly me to the moon" as recorded by Frank Sinatra (the original was a waltz from the 1920s)
“I mean that I took a gun and put it to his stupid sweaty head and I pulled the trigger. I am pretty sure he is dead. I don’t think he could have survived that, But I never really checked.”
Fairbanks is an exuberant lead, and his presence makes The Black Pirate feel buoyant and joyously free. The film seems capable of anything when we’re watching him in it—as limitless as the sea it’s filmed upon. But The Black Pirate can also be a still film, with a plot that drifts and bobs along, without no hint of breeze to propel it. We first start to feel this about halfway through the second act. That’s about when the trickster’s games catch up with him, and Fairbanks is forced to walk the plank. We all know he’ll survive the drop, but The Black Pirate itself barely does. Without its star, the film isn’t too sea-worthy.
I started with a white card base, and added a layer of Basic Grey, Lemonade designer paper. Next, I stamped my image in VersaFine Black Onyx and heated on clear detail embossing powder. The stamp I used is from Art Impressions and is L-1350. The coloring was done with Copic Markers, and the sponging with SU! , Positively Pink. My image was cut out with a Nestabilities Label Twenty-Two. The little flower cluster in the corner, is a Prima, with A few punches of leaves, including the MS Branch Punch. My sentiment is an unknown and is on an SU! punch that I borrowed from my DD. Two dew drops and some outlining with a Stardust pen for sparkle, and it is a done deal.
Although this was not the first time i was invited to present my masters research (i also attended the 2010 Sloan-c conference) i was much more confident and relax during this year’s presentation. I have spent many months mastering my craft and learning about the principles and theories of e-learning and blended learning environments, and this presentation was an opportunity for me to do my part as a researcher and contribute to the growing field of blended learning environment.
When you have the ability to answer these questions to the deepest part of your soul, you have developed a Testimony. If you only have a little bit of a belief, it is still a Testimony. This is when you are to share it with others. Listen to others share their beliefs. Each person has the ability to help strengthen each other and support each other in the time that is used to grow. If you have a testimony and do nothing with it, it will shrink and die. Treat it like a living object, for that is what a testimony is. If you share it and do everything that you can to help it grow by praying, reading scriptures, and all other experiences that you encourage to come into your life, it will grow.
The couple donated money to help build a hospital in Mesa, Ariz., founded a theater in Scottsdale, Ariz., raised money for the Phoenix Symphony and served as a member of the Arizona Press Club. They also founded Combined Charities Inc., a foundation that allowed smaller charities to use the interest from its consolidated donations. Ross later ran unsuccessfully for governor.
Once we graduate our lives still are not ours. I will have to find a job, one that I enjoy or one that I do not, to pay back the thousands of dollars in loans I will have built up from attending college in the first place. I realize that I do have control over working hard and finding a job that I love, but it has to fit into this box of what is conventional.
Among the many festivals taking place in Riga during Spring-Summer period. I can mention Go Blond-Festival. Marika Gederte is a blond from Riga, and she and her friends invited to all European blonds to have fun in Riga the first week of June.
They are living simply by our sophisticated standards, luxury and fashion are not words that would enter into their vocabulary. Always cheerful, they do 'think quietly' and so often 'listen to birds and babes with open heart'. They most certainly 'await occasions' as their lives revolve around the traditions of the past and their diaries are ruled by the seasons. This couple are the definition of patience for there is no such act or word as 'hurry' in the Provencal world. Their symphony is rich...a life lived in harmony. A life that is content...xv
The Met Office are one of the most enthusiastic supporters of Global Warming (AGW)
3. Big 10 - 2.92
You just have to toughen up. Tell youself it’s their loss and get on and find someone else to try.
I don’t know how many will enter the competition. I know it will push almost all of them completely out of their comfort zone, but I feel the experience of doing it will be all the more rewarding because of that.
Sure, in theory I could apply for food stamps, but that would take resources away from people who are truly destitute, who don't have food in the house in the first place. Sure, I've paid into the system and I've "earned" the right to apply for food stamps...but is it moral to take the means to buy food away from others who have no food at all when I have enough food to feed my family for several months? I've "earned" this right by paying into the system, but just because I have this "right," does this mean that it's moral or Biblical for me to do this just because I've "earned" it? There's no way in good conscience I can do this--I'd be like a rich man robbing a bank because he didn't feel rich enough. Meanwhile, more people go hungry because I've taken what I'm entitled to, even though I don't need it and they do. Those of you who have been hungry before know the misery I went through so many years ago. Millions of people in this country are going through that same misery at this moment. What would Jesus do? He'd help feed the hungry, not take food away from them. I might be broke, but I've got food. And I'm in a position to help hungry people. I hope you will find those opportunities as well no matter what you're "entitled" to.
It was never that way for me though. I have been a racing fan from my earliest days. I grew up as mesmerized by the greats of racing — Foyt, Sneva, the Unsers and my favorite Mario Andretti – as I was by my heroes on the Cincinnati Reds. To this day I root for anything with the Andretti name on it. I read every book about race car drivers. I knew all the greats, whether they had driven before I was born or in some cases even if they had died before I was born. But I was always solidly an open-wheel racing (IndyCars, Formula 1) guy.
Maturity matters. Some people I know married early in life, but they had it together enough to make it work. On the other hand, there are perpetually lagging souls who only present as decent prospects after a few years in oak barrels. Everyone's mileage varies.
Westernization
In the last couple of months, I have been seeing a couple of blog that have been posting a couple of items they like to get but haven’t gotten it yet.
Walking away,
As I trust the Lord and submit to His headship, I will be able to submit to my husband. Submission may be an uphill battle, but the victory is gained little-by-little when my heart and mind are committed to Jesus. Philippians 4:13 assures me that “I can do all things through Christ who strengthens me.”
We also know that his “fly economy class” image is a stunt. He flies economy class between Penang and Kuala Lumpur but he is not telling the DAP zombies that he prefers First Class when he goes overseas!
The licensee will want a reduced royalty to come into force automatically. But the more favourable terms provision precludes this, as the licensor has to agree to all terms and conditions of the new licence. The licensee should insist that the licensor advise the licensee of an additional licence on more favourable terms, but should also allow at least three months following execution of the additional licence for such a disclosure. At the same time, the licensor should insist that failure to notify not be treated as a breach. Instead acceptance of the new terms by the licensee can be made retroactive, with interest applied to any reduced royalties that would have come into effect.
It means freedom to use your abilities the best you can, to craft a life for yourself to the best of your ability. It means freedom to protect that which you have earned, from other people, in a manner that's true to the Constitution that founded this country.
I realized that the day my MEGAN&LIAM novel comes off of Amazon’s KDP Select program (the day I’m not contractually bound to Amazon anymore for exclusive selling rights), is exactly six months after the day I put my first novel up for sale (well, it’s six months and one day…but that’s pretty close!) Realizing that prompted me to sit down and think, really, really think, about what it is I’m doing here…what I’ve accomplished…what I want to accomplish…how it’s all going.
-Dinner and a Movie-
The sex is the hottest either of them has ever experienced and Simone discovers just how naughty she can be with Drake, while he finds himself feeling things for her that he hasn’t felt in a very long time. When the Voodoo priestess learns of their relationship, however, she comes after him again. She is determined to make sure he won’t have a future with Simone, even if that means killing both him and the woman he loves.
“weeping wind.”
There are several advantages to making the payroll tax truly progressive.
Writing on the non-denominational and international character of Christian Endeavor, Count Bernstorff, an eminent German Christian, wrote: “There is only one Christianity, because there is only one Christ. Is it English that one insists upon conversion. . . . Is it English to avow a oneness of spirit with Christians of other denominations. . . . Is it English that one should seek after holiness. . . . Is it English that all Christians should work together for the upbuilding of Christ’s kingdom? All these things are simple biblical truths, and should be the universal spirit of Christendom. Indeed, they constitute living Christendom” (Clark, Christian Endeavor, supra, pp. 618-619).
Here's the check list I'm using to see how well the setting match the needs of the game. Some of the items involve what adventurers do or need, some are institutionalized in D&D's mechanics:
M&M day Master proclaimed. Maintenance I asked...that is what Monday's are for, every week, no guessing when or forgetting. He had me lean over the arm of the sofa. I groaned as I felt the cool, hard, smooth surface of a large paddle. (It was a large paddle ball paddle, that I hate.) Maintenance is not supposed to be fun...it is a deterrant to a punishment, He repeated once again. I was having difficulty wrapping my head around...no warm up, not being spanked in over a week, and that darn paddle. He did not start off slowly or easily, and it did not take long efore I was rising a little...He warned me and put His hand on my back. I was strugging, it HURT and I could not get above it.
Proverbs 1:19 Such is the fate of all who are greedy for money; it robs them of life. (NLT)
We announced the Malcolm Hardee Award shortlist yesterday and, today, there was a very funny report on the nominees in The Scotsman, but also a wonderfully surreal online report which I can only assume was cobbled-together from other reports and put through a particularly dodgy piece of automatic translation software.
Actually, let’s set a more tangible goal. I was once a Teach for America corps member and we really like measurable goals. I will mark this month down as a successful one if I blog 20 days out of the 31 in May. (Also, if I pack up my house for the move, sell at least $400 worth of stuff on Ebay, and finish all of my work on time for my writing class, and lose 20 pounds.)
Kink & Fetish
I feel quite vaguely optimistic about this new year. Okay, so I've had to work mostly through the Christmas and New Year, with no signs of things easing up for another few weeks. Incessant overtime does not suit my indolent nature. And Simon has just gone off on a nearly-7-week holiday without me. Sad!
Not only did the SNP massively fail to win Glasgow, they only got 5 extra seats.
For the vast majority of people with epilepsy, it is a condition that affects their daily lives but does not prevent them from enjoying life. For people like Cassidy and Traci, epilepsy is just the hand they’ve been dealt, and they choose to make their lives meaningful and hopeful in spite of the challenges they face.
… Let’s cut the bullshit here. We bailed because we don’t want the potential loss. There, I said it. It’s not “balance” we’re seeking as the Bama games in 2013 & 2014 actually gave us balance…
"Yes, I remember, ugh. Anyway, how would you like to double your profits on that song?"
The optical lens is named after the Latin word for lentil, lens. Unlike most other beans, lentils don’t need to be soaked before cooking.
6. Today is April 15 – tax day! However, due to some sort of D.C. holiday tomorrow, which has to be celebrated today (i.e. not on the weekend), we all get the option of waiting until Monday to turn in our taxes. This is good since I can’t get my accountant on the phone.
Luke 24; Psalm 10; 2 Samuel 15
Or amplitude that modulates
it with our gaze, as a pianist lifts her palms from the keys to better track melody on the page.
Your Daddy and I love you so---
I am in a better place, although I'm still fragile. I have made some connections for support. And we're going to take things a little slower in therapy.
By Tony Alvarez
JamesVahn007
It’s not often that The Wife and The Baby join me for a trip to Wegmans on Sunday. Frankly, The Wife hates the entire idea of grocery shopping and on days like today when my daughter is acting her age (she’ll be two in June), it’s not safe to take her and do the trip solo. As it was, Layla decided she liked the limes…particularly how they made her fingers taste. She also seemed to like licking the lemons. We needed one anyways, so we bought the one she tasted.
9. Gutter Christ
After reading about her on 3dayz.com, I am deeply concerned about the continued housing and display of Yupi the polar bear at the Parque Zoologico Benito Juarez (Morelia Zoo) in Mexico. I support moving her to a more appropriate naturalistic accomodation in a more appropriate climate as soon as possible and would like for you to team up with Zoocheck Canada for advise in this matter.
Gingrich argued that recidivism rates are unacceptably high and that churches and non-profits need to offer more resources and support to help offenders who are released from prison build productive lives in the community.
Swine Program Scam?
Of course we sustained ourselves on more than coffee and vintage dresses (although let’s be honest, that’s close to all a girl needs). Exhibit A: a horrifically full English brekkie at The Tavern Co. Exhibit B: a mini steak-and-kidney pie that found me the next day. Needless to say this weekend was a vegetarian hall pass, and I was happy to come home and plan on a month of lentils, veggies, beans, and tempeh.
The invention of the wheel is the subject of innumerable humorous cartoons. What surprises many people is that no one in the ancient New World invented the wheel. When Europeans arrived, there were no wheeled vehicles in North or South America.
I guess if you can't remember it, it doesn't get added to the list. Oh well, I suppose there's always next weekend to find a new needle for that broken compass of mine.
I am beyond lost. This will weigh on my heart and mind until the 9th of May rolls around. I wish this was easier by now. I wish I was over it by now.
Storyline: 5/5 – It was so perfect yet painful. The entire anime retells the past, something which is lost, and from that the audience feels tremendous heartache. The gradual development between Gin and Hotaru is very sweet and cute. We could really see how they went from ‘onii-san and kiddo’ to ‘boy and girl’. It was just so sweet and lovely, full stop. The ending (not really a happy ending nor a tragedy) but the heart throb lingered for hours and hours. There’s a part of me that just wish that some cliche miracle would happen (obviously that won’t) but really, it is just perfect the way it is.
i love blogging.
November ~ Beaver, Frosty or Oak Moon
No, it’s the other way around: most radio airplay has been designed to avoid us.
Prime Minister: Potential? This government strives to bring about conditions where everyone can live their lives fully….Pop Idol, X Factor, Fame Academy, there’s so much talent out there. It’s great to see people getting the chance to show their potential…I hope the Spice Girls will come back, although it may be beyond even Bob Geldof to get that to happen.
The number didn't reappear on a Dodger player until Los Angeles acquired reliever Phil Regan from the Tigers. In the best performance for the No. 27 since the days of Pete Reiser, Regan went 14-1 with a 1.62 ERA in 65 games for the 1966 Dodgers and led them to the World Series.
class chef.
Soooo here is the surprise I’ve promised to some of you!
The rituals and songs in its honor are even sadder because of circumstances of the death.
Well, if I had this camera which is way nicer/more expensive. But I never learned how to do that. But last time it didn’t work out how I wanted.
Mentors often ask hard questions. But they ask because they care.
Make sure children are inside before dusk, and stay inside until after dawn.
I know many of you are not local to the Orlando, Florida area, so here is a link to a great list of bake sales that will be happening all across the U.S. on April 28th ! The contact info for each event is listed.
Last night we had “The World’s Largest Ice Cream Sundae” which consisted of 4 gallons of ice cream, an entire bottle of chocolate and caramel syrup, three jars of cherries, one jar of nuts, three cans of whipped cream, and 10-15 bananas. We sat in a row, all 9 of our high school students, and ate from a 10 foot plastic rain gutter! It was delicious! I cannot wait to tell my friend Nate Dame, a youth ministry volunteer and the founder of Called To Youth Ministry.com; that’s the power of networking. It is a relationship with a person on the other side of the country who I have only met through Google Hangouts- yet I cannot wait to tell him about this activity and HOW MUCH FUN IT WAS.
1/2 teaspoon saffron threads, crumbled
I guess my point is that there needs to be some kind of conflict in PSL each year, and Tejada is an easy mark. I’m sure Collins will give his pep talk as to why he should show up early, but the reality is, he’ll be there this weekend, and we’ll forget this has all happened once they start playing some games.
We all have read a book and gravitated towards characters we love. Sometimes they’re quirky, smart, or clever. Other times they’re creative villains who are downright rotten to the core… yet they seem lovable in a way. Villains lovable? It might seem hard to believe, but many very well known villains have qualities that are appealing. In looking at Facebook this week Disney is highlighting some of the most beloved villains they’ve created. With Halloween around the corner it’s pretty common for them to pay homage to these evil additions to their stories.
Working there went against almost every natural instinct I had. I HATED it. For one thing, Liam's peers were these extremely young kids (youngest two and a half). I believed in my heart of hearts that they should be with *their* moms, not Liam's mom! A big part of the philosophy there was getting kids to separate from their parents, and I felt that was fundamentally wrong. So, I was unwilling to make it easy for these moms to be away from their kids. Not that I wouldn't comfort a crying child: Of course, I would. But, I would also contact these moms to let them know that their kids needed them.
use resources wisely,
The gist of the conversation was that Beloved didn’t have a birth certificate, and the cost of replacement certificates. She decided that due to the fact he didn’t have a BC he was an immigrant. He pointed out that he did have one, just not where she thought.
the appeal of anticipation
We used Varathane brand (click here to see the can's English side - oops) Premium Diamond Wood Finish in clear gloss. It, too, is water-based and although meant for outdoor items, worked just fine for a desk. The helpful salesman at Canadian Tire who sold me my tiny first can of varnish is not as obsessed with glossiness as me. When I bought my second can, this time at Home Hardware, the helpful salesman there suggested I buy a bigger can. I'll use the rest, he reasoned. He's smart.
JORN 3 —
garlic
All I can say is that Lesley has good taste when it comes to choosing the Dynamic Duos.
I’ve also written a whole series of fairy tale sequels, the Happy Ever After books (Orchard, illustrated by Sarah Warburton) in one of which – Mr Wolf Bounces Back – the Big Bad Wolf has to admit (after failing to catch Little Red Riding Hood or the Three Little Pigs) that he can’t bring home the bacon like he used to. So to feed his own little wolf cubs, he has to get a job – and ends up as a ‘wolf in sheep’s clothing’ acting as a security guard for... the Three Little Pigs. But then who else would know just what kind of threats they might face?
“What’s that you’ve created there, Ugg? Fire, you say? Seems like pretty dangerous stuff to me. Perhaps you ought to just put the sticks down and come on a hunt. We’re going to climb a tree and try killing a Saber-toothed Tiger with harsh language so we don’t get hurt. You like your Tiger steak rare… right?”
Because Jesus has been doing healings like this on the Sabbath, some Jews start accusing him of breaking the law against working on the Sabbath. Jesus counters that God, his Father, is always at work, and therefore he too is working. This only ignites the Jews’ anger further, because now not only is Jesus working on the Sabbath, but he’s also calling God his “Father”. The Jews find this blasphemous because it makes him equal to God, and of course no human could be God’s equal. Jesus answers that he can do nothing on his own; he can only do what he sees his Father doing, “because whatever the Father does the Son does also.” God loves his Son and shows him everything he does, and will show him even greater things than what they see now. Just as the Father raises the dead and gives them life, the Son also gives life. More than that, the Father “has entrusted all judgment to the Son, that all may honor the Son just as they honor the Father. He who does not honor the Son does not honor the Father, who sent him.”
Now if you take the blinkie above and put it in your sidebar you can have a second entry to win the fabulous ribbons above,just leave your name a second time with Inlinkz below....
I said, “Bring on the snail.”
#24 Endtroducing… by Eliot Wilder
Download this app now for an enjoyable day of stories and community building exercises that allow perspectives to be shared, relationships to be fast-tracked and vital trust to emerge. Your team will then be ready to hit the ground running.
10 Having My Picture Taken
Of those two cancellations, the one that rankles less is Rubicon's. There are a lot of things this show did well, and in some cases these are things that no other show on TV is doing, but it wasn't good TV, and for a substantial portion of its run it was even quite bad. A lot of this is down to bad luck--originally conceived as a modern callback to 70s conspiracy thrillers, in which Will Travers (James Badge Dale) an analyst for a government think-tank, investigates the seemingly accidental death of his mentor, Rubicon was heavily retooled shortly into its production run, and its creator, Jason Horwitch, was replaced with Henry Bromell, who shifted the show's focus from conspiracies to workplace drama. This was entirely the right move, and the episodes that downplay Will's investigation in favor of his colleagues' actual work are among the best in the show's run, but the change came too late. Having established its central mystery, Rubicon was yoked to a story, and a main character, that were both significantly less interesting than what was going on in their background. I don't know if Rubicon would have been a ratings success if it had debuted as a drama about intelligence work, but it certainly would have been a stronger and more successful show.
Assuming the publisher is not confused about the difference between rights and copyright, and really intends to take ownership, what advantage does it gain from a temporary, rather than a permanent, transfer of copyright? Possibly, the publisher wants to avoid being lumbered with copyrights whose value has been wrung dry, and intends to get rid of copyrights for which it no longer has a use. But another reason may be that the temporary grant makes copyright transfer more palatable to nervous writers. "Yes, you're giving us ownership of your copyright," the publisher can say. "But it's okay, because in the end we give it back!"
Most days I’m also able to get words written during Cupcake’s afternoon nap, but there’s also housework…
Pretty accessories:
2. I do my best creative work after nine or ten at night. For some reason, all becomes clear to me at that point and work as one in a trance. On schoolnights, this is often around my bedtime, which makes it hard for me to sleep, since my brain is so active.
So this week, I'm going to take my partner out for a meal. Take my son swimming, and my sister out for a drink. And enjoy every minute of it.
Many thoughts full of
Well I'm going to run. Hope you all are well! Happy Hump Day!
Situations like what happened to my sister and me in Wal-Mart can happen to anyone, anytime, anywhere. We need to be prepared. A predator is very like a wolf stalking an caribou. We are the caribou. At the first hint of danger, that caribou doesn't just brush off its sense of fear. It does what instinct tells it to do -- it runs!
To the newcomer to Peru, this bias manifests itself when asking for a soda (or gaseosa to use the local vernacular). After making a request for a fizzy beverage, the clerk will then ask if you want your soda helada (cold) or sin helada (not cold).
THIS is our beautiful "FORMAL" dining room.....
Lets talk about our body. I know I do have some parts of my body I wish were different and thats something I´m not proud of. Because I know that it´s just me. I am the only person who think there is something wrong with me. And this is a common issue for so many girls around the world. Pretty girls thinks their ugly. You can not see yourself better than others can see you. If someone tells you that you are beautiful, I don’t care if its only one person who says that; You better take it seriously. And be thankful. Because the truth of the matter is that we are all beautiful, just not to everyone.
from me as my genealogy blog West in New England but I hope to do better
A few more years passed and Scooter passed away suddenly. She was about 37 years old we think, give or take (she was always a liar when it came to her age), and seemed incredibly happy to get rid of us all. What we hadn’t expected was for Spooky to become ill as well just a week later. Like many older cats, his kidneys weren’t keeping up and it was time to make a decision. (My personal theory is that he couldn’t stand the idea that she was happy somewhere in the afterlife without him, so he had to go after to make sure she was miserable.)
wherever they’ve been set down ---
I’ve met him on the seaside in Barcelona (at el Forum) on a rainy and cold morning. There was nobody else around and he looked like a great character, doing exercise on the pier in his swimming costume.
The markets don’t care what Berlin thinks, and they don’t care about discipline: too much discipline is bad for business. All they want is a credible EU guarantor of last resort. They don’t care if it’s Berlin, the ECB, the IMF, Wen Jaibao or the Tooth Fairy…they just want one. Or else.
The bill for the stadium has still a long process to go, so now all we can do is sit and wait. It will most likely be passed because the new stadium would be such a great benefit for the state of Minnesota. Not just because it would give out more jobs and might help establish casinos, but because it would make Minnesota a center of tourism. With the new stadium might come a chance to host a second Super Bowl or a fourth NCAAB Final Four. It’s time for the Vikings to move on to greener pastures if they hope to win a Super Bowl. In the upcoming weeks, look forward to a big draft article. Skol!
“When the Swedish welfare state collapses,” said Fjordman, “the immigrants who lose their payments will have to go somewhere. Denmark will probably be fairly successful at keeping them out. A lot of them will migrate to Norway, some will move to Germany and the Netherlands, and some will probably end up in Eastern Europe.”
“And I said, Lord, they know that I imprisoned and beat in every synagogue them that believe on thee.”
Nothing was turning out the way I saw it in my
Running: 22nd March 2012 – 13th May 2012
Here's the full review:
Well, I've had an interesting last week-or-so. On Thursday there was a hell of a party. On Friday, there were at least two hells of a hangover. Then over the weekend I quit my band (amicably and by mutual agreement, for the best interests of the band, but it still takes some getting my head around).
Thanks for visiting! I hope you will leave a comment to let me know you were here.
Reading it recently gave me goosebumps – not just because it’s spooky, but because it evokes so wonderfully the sights, sounds and smells of a part of the country I first fell in love with then. And more than anything, because it was written by her.
From December 2011 to January 2012, we added 284,000 non-farm payroll employees, had 1.177 million drop out of the labor force and the unemployment rate dropped from 8.5% to 8.3%. From January 2012 to February 2012, we added 227,000 non-farm payroll employees, had 310,000 fewer people drop out of the labor force and the unemployment rate stayed the same. Hmmm. We created 57,000 less new non-farm payroll employees than the month before. We had a swing in the “not in labor force” category of 1.487 million people. Yet the rate was unchanged. Confusing?
The new Chaos Codex, tentatively called “Codex Chaos Legions”, has been looming on the horizon for quite a while now. And while all the augurs and soothsayers in our wonderful blogosphere cannot yet decide whether it’s a new 4ok edition first, then CSM, then DA or the other way around, it seems reasonably safe to assume that a new book is on its way sooner rather than later. So what better time to discuss my anticipation as well as my misgivings about the whole affair?
It got so bad that I went to a clinic today and got a steroid shot and a new prescription for albuterol, I have a nebulizer and have been using some old stuff for the past few days. My chest is so tight I can't get a deep breath to get the medicine in there.
Man, most deceptive is thy mind, which,
Creating a relationship is very much like creating a baby. You get a desire in your heart to have a baby. Then you take the necessary action to conceive the baby. That’s followed by months and months of feeding, caring, and nurturing yourself and your baby. During this whole process, you go through physical and emotional changes that are sometimes challenging. You learn to adapt to doing things in different ways because of your physical changes. You adjust your sleeping positions and patterns because that’s what it takes. You visit the doctor regularly to ensure the healthy development of your baby. You eat healthy food and avoid junk food. So on and so forth…
A side view...fabulous chipboard balloons from my scrapbook box...had a rumage for a birthday badge and found these...inside decorated as well....and a chipboard no.4..
Uttered in the iconic rasp of Marlon Brando, the words of Vito Corleone illustrate how he creates a loyal community among those he has helped. Moore says, “By granting these favors and helping people with their problems, Vito Corleone is building a network of influence–relationships that may or may not deliver a specific or quantifiable return, but all which serve to strengthen his power base and which have the potential to be reciprocal in the long run.”
CarrieAnne
Bronwyn Parry
for several years. Before taking this trip I contacted Cavan Genealogy in Cavan Town contracting for them to search for my family. I requested they not mail the report to me. I wanted to pick it up in person. I wanted the opportunity to talk to someone in person and ask questions. I hoped to find information and to see the places the Coyles had lived.
You will feel certifiably bipolar. I can say this with conviction because I live with someone who is just that, and I often sense myself mirroring his ups and downs in direct correlation to my writing life. When I start a new project, I'm manic about it. It's all I can think about. It's all I can breathe. When I've been sending out a story for months and the rejections are piling up, I'm depressed over it. I can't even fathom subbing the damn thing to one more editor... just one more editor... And this is after I've already spent countless months working on it, to the point where the sight of it nearly makes me sick.
Water - ½ cup
Add grated ginger, garlic, carrom seeds, lemon juice, chopped coriander, chickpea powder and salt. Toss well to ensure they are coated all over. Cover and leave it in the fridge for 2 hours.
So that even the small things won’t tire you out, i’m eternally in love
We, as a military, will execute these orders and move forward. It's up
Membership Director
Why am I not doing that you ask? Well guess what. I tried this in the summer but I ain’t good at this. His eyes just look past all my flaws, the don’t care about how I got that scar on my nose or why I like video games. They see why I am nice and how my heart pounds in my chest. They see the shyness grow over my cheeks when he says hello. His arms that hugged me almost made me fall asleep. My sad pathetic life was struck by an earthquake because of this…this…. Guy. And he knows it!!! Gosh I hate that he knows. That he plays dumb when I make flirtatious jokes and he is all “what?”
one in the magic lamp so desperately coveted by the wicked
For the price of half a jumbo pack of Crappy Tire's drill bits, I bought a single cobalt-tipped bit. And while I was lamenting our struggle to the helpful staff, Ken suggested that we go super slow with the drill. I said we were using a slow (but powerful) .5” drill. He said 'Make sure you can see the bit turning'.
For about sixteen years, Christ travelled through Turkey, Persia, Western Europe and possibly England. He finally arrived with Mary to a place near Kashmir, where she died. After many years in Kashmir, teaching to an appreciative population, who venerated him as a great prophet, reformer and saint, he died and was buried in a tomb in Kashmir itself.
J.Crew 3/4 sleeve stripe chunky sweater
Free Admission
Taste (0-10 points): Nice balance of malt and hops. Sets a nice backdrop for the vanilla bourbon flavors to play out. A very smooth beer, with moderate mouthfeel. Ten points.
“King Nebuchadnezzar, we do not need to defend ourselves before you in this matter. If we are thrown into the blazing furnace, the God we serve is able to deliver us from it, and he will deliver us from Your Majesty’s hand. But even if he does not, we want you to know, Your Majesty, that we will not serve your gods or worship the image of gold you have set up.”
Speaking of cold weather, I think men love knit beanies. I gather this when girls put them on before leaving the pub on a winter’s night and men just smile stupidly (the more stupid the smile, the more he fancies her). I also think certain fedoras, trilbies, whatever they’re called, are a sexy solution to bad weather – and as a recent trip to Vegas proved, a decent dance prop.
Fatah and Hamas both claim to represent the Palestinians, often killing one another’s members to prove it. Fatah is located on the West Bank while Hamas controls Gaza, a place where rockets are launched into Israel every day in order to incite it to retaliate. Then, of course, the world gets to condemn--who?--the Israelis!
Other things its does I like:
2010.08.18 Pal. Auth. Gaza 1 0 A 62-year-old woman is murdered outside her own home by Islamic fundamentalists.
Anyway, here's what I've been working on.
Ring any bells? Maybe an old college or high school buddy? Past work associate?
Tennessee 6-Mar 58 13 27 9 0
It’s a long-time partnership. Both political parties working on many levels, to get it done.
So the people round my dinner table were basically preaching intolerance, and me and my husband were expected to go along with it. The conversation got round to who we would vote for. I can't vote, but I said that as Martine Aubry didn't get to be socialist candidate I would vote, if I could for Sarkozy. I actually quite like him, and I really really can't stand François Hollande.
The possibilities for innovation are not, by any means, exhausted. Technological development is always offering new opportunities for innovative design. But innovative design always develops in tandem with innovative technology, and can never be an end in itself.
New York Times architecture critic Nicolai Ouroussoff called it "the finest skyscraper to rise in New York since Eero Saarinen’s CBS building went up 46 years ago." New Yorker magazine's Paul Goldberger described it as "one of the most beautiful towers downtown." Goldberger compared Gehry's tower to the nearby Woolworth Building, completed in 1913, and said that "it is the first thing built downtown since then that actually deserves to stand beside it." These are extraordinary accolades from New York City's premier architecture critics who are hard to please and prone to dissect and crucify. But the accolades are justified.
Maybe more so, even. Like, say you’ve got an average-looking asshole. You resent and dislike this person for being an asshole. But if this asshole were say, really ugly or really good looking, I’m going to hazard a guess that your dislike for this asshole will be amplified. You’ll zoom in on all their physical imperfections (or lack thereof), and resent them even more.
When most people practice, they repeat things they already know how to do. But when those who become experts in their field engage in practice, they spend most of their time doing things they don’t already know how to do. They are constantly challenging themselves to improve, to do things better, to gain additional skills. Deliberate practice isn’t just hacking around; it’s hard work, which demands reaching for objectives that are always just out of reach. The only way to attain those objectives is through immense amounts of repetition. Ted Williams, the great Red Sox hitter, used to take swing after practice swing until his hands bled. Larry Bird, the legendary basketball player, got up at 6 a.m. every morning in high school, went to the gym, and shot 500 free throws.
But parking, which typically serves just one person, which is more harmful to the environment, which if you're able to spend that much cash on means you're probably doing pretty well, that gets the COLA?
In January, it was a cold winter night. Winter in the Dominican means that it can get as cold as 60 degrees at night! Brrrr! Many of our church members chose to stay at home rather than brave the blustery, chilly evening. I went the two blocks from the church in my van to pick up the 6 children from our orphanage for divine service in Palmar Arriba. Out of the house came Moises, Randy, Ramona, Francis, and Junior. It was dark and I didn’t see Estefani. So, I left the children in the van and went to the house asking about Estefani. Ariel said, “Pastor, I think she is in the van.” I said, “No, I didn’t see her go past me in the wheelchair.” Ariel responded, “Pastor, she didn’t use the wheelchair, she walked out.” That is exactly what had happened. I had seen Estefani, but I had not seen her because she had no wheelchair! Estefani is learning through therapy and Christian love that it is ok to live without her disability and be simply whom God the Father has called her to be, His beloved daughter, through baptism and the faith that He has given her!
Perfect couple from my point of view - this is a hell of a beautiful woman and a devilishly clever man.
11. Percy Fired – music by David Matthews
She also suggested painting the paneling a pale color. Other friends have suggested that also, as this room is pretty dark at night even with lights. Right now I'm leaning towards a warm grey or cool beige. I'll also be taking down that ugly curtain rod. I'm still not sure as to what type of window treatment to do. I want the window to stay open, because that looks right out onto Lake Michigan, and is beautiful. In the cabinets underneath is where all my fabric is stored.
with a discontented sigh
This is a really difficult question for me. I'd like a dedicated writing space, which is mine and mine alone, somewhere I can store books, put up pictures on the wall, generally use as a creative space.
"It's intrusive to have guys with guns and a dog," she complained. "What's really going to happen if a bomb goes off? Too much money is going to the wrong places, but New Yorkers will tolerate anything after 9/11."
I pick Emma because I have a crazy stupid obsession with her; Meryl because she is beautiful and one of the most – if not the most- talented actresses of all time; Oprah because I think she’s really inspiring and I could learn a lot from her.
“Having that kind of curiosity about the world helps anyone succeed, no matter what kind of work they decide to pursue.”
Beer is the elixir of the gods. A refreshing beverage made of hops, barley and a pantheon of other delicacies that when looked at properly - through beer goggles perhaps, has quite literally changed the entire course of human history.A mash tun of scientific evidence is accumulating that now backs up that statement. Beer did in fact play a very important role in mankind's evolution from nomadic hunter-gatherers to a settled, civilized people. Man discovered that planting crops allowed him to control his own destiny. No longer would he be held under the cruel thumb of Mother Nature, moving to and fro aimlessly across the continents in constant search of food.
My mom was born and raised in Spokane, Washington. All her “people” were out there. And we were going to meet them all. My mom informed us that it would take three days and three nights to get out there. Whaat? We were going to sleep on a train? . My dad was excited too…..because he wasn’t going with us. I have a feeling that he would have gotten off in Chicago or jumped out on the tracks two days in. He wasn’t a big fan of my mother. Or maybe her mother. But, he was going to stay home and take care of Susie the dog.
Neither of us won the prize, but I am humbled to have been a tiny part of the heart, instinct and courage I witnessed that night. Joy, indeed.
Whirlpool Water Filters – Best Filtration Systems
At present 900 Reebok outlets are operational in India. According to a Delhi-based franchisee, who did not want to be identified, “Since the last six to seven months Reebok was working to abolish the MG model and work on a rent plus margin model with its franchisees in India.”
QCGQB Blog (qcgqbblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
I have my backup plans in place. You know - emailing yourself the file, saving multiple/progressive copies, printing copies at points throughout the month. Oh - and that reminds me, I need to have my husband ensure the printer is ready to go. Paper, ink, drivers!
Don't be too quick to clear the table. The best conversations seem to take place at this time. Enjoy this.
There were a few small clouds popping up now in advance of the front however I didn’t have a great deal of success under them – oddly the best lift seemed to be well off to the side of them rather than underneath, but at least with Kirsty nearby it was possible to turn back and rejoin the lift.
As a teacher and mind/body wellness practitioner I recommend that you start broad and narrow as you go. This means that you begin by becoming “The Observer” in your life. This doesn’t mean that you are taking a back seat and giving up control over where your life is going. Actually, quite the opposite. It truly gives you a much better ability to steer past potential obstacles that could get you “stuck” in wrong thinking and repetitive mistakes.
“We are very excited about our new partnership with HSN and look forward to its continued success,” said Pamela Drucker Mann, vice president and publisher of Bon Appetit.
Well, the holiday season was so busy this year that I didn't find the time to do our annual Christmas letter. I really like doing it. It adds such a nice personal touch to the Christmas card and is such a nice recap of the year. So while it may not have gone out to my friends, I've decided to do one here in cyberspace for all my wonderful cyber friends. And mainly just for me to have a record of where we are. So here goes:
Hibiki is Suntory's top shelf blend, but they have a number of other labels that are limited to Japan. The grain whiskey is distilled at the Chita distillery, which has also done single grain expressions.
CNAs help residents complete their passive range of motion (PROM) exercises when the residents are unable to do these exercises on their own, unassisted. Its very important that CNAs assist with PROMs correctly to avoid injuring the residents. The exercises are important because we want to keep the residents mobile. These are rehabilitation tasks and you will assist them as directed by a doctor, physical therapist, or as outlined in the care plan.
The violence stopped only when Mr Wang, now 33, found a meat cleaver and hit Steven Shaw with it, causing a ‘sharp force trauma’ to his head. The burglar, 32, was pronounced dead after being taken to hospital.
Hyperactivity
I had to go to him. He didn't run fast or far. I caught up to him quickly and held his hand. He flopped on the floor. He did not want to walk. Which he expressed loudly. I called his name. He still didn't answer me. So I calmly finished the grocery order.
Traditionally Matt is the milk shake maker and I am the popcorn maker.
“Then we won’t touch.” I pulled my hand back and smiled when she stood. “Just dance.”
Burned a hole
its invisible pull
The company belongs to the Adonai Group, founded by Nigerian businessman Adegboyega Olulade.
 More and easier access to White “wimmins.”
Will enough qualified care workers be available to serve the many millions who’ll be best off at home? Doubtful unless some major policy changes are made.
Simone Elkeles did a great workshop where she shared all kinds of personal information. She laid it all out there: the advances she got for her books, the promotion efforts she tried that worked and those that didn’t, print runs, you name it. She said that it pissed her off when she was a newbie and wanted information and no one would give specifics, so she decided she would.
Go to www.burlingtonedfoundation.org to register and for more details.
Enough reason to stay, right? I think make-up is also a way to show respect to people we meet, for example to an interview.
When the disruptions become too intense, ask for help. And resolve to work with the professionals, rather than scold them for not doing enough or not caring for a loved one as we would.
The sky is so beautiful.
My grandfather had raised me in an old barracks of a house in Wexford. I had ingested his version of Irish history and, at an early age, could debate all the old arguments, though I disappointed him with my love for the “turncoat” Mick Collins.
And they love him too!
For our new friend Eric, losing weight a second time around is going to be harder because he’s lost the powerhouse of fat burning: lean muscle. In most cases Eric isn’t going to return to his original weight; he’s going to go even higher.
At the end of the battle Washington and much of the Continental Army fled Brooklyn at Fulton Ferry Landing to Manhattan, where they pretty much kept running, leaving New York to the British for the duration of the war. And since a British occupier liked a drink as much as the next chap, some of Brooklyn’s taverns became their favored saloons — such as the one at Fulton Ferry.
Good, hard workout for myself
While they were killed
and let me know what kind of content you are looking forward to see here (optional).
* Color?
he tried another poem
But enough Small talk and on to what I dropped in for, to tell you all about Todays' Project!!
I looked around. The church in the middle of the road that I remembered partially remained, its columns stripped for rebuilding purposes. The fittings for the phone boxes were sticking up from the ground, wires splayed everywhere like dropped spaghetti. My guide walked further up the block, looked around the corner, and beckoned me to him.
Of loving you to excess.
1/3 cup light brown sugar
And don't try to stare into Prados with tinted glass for the same reason.
100. Things Fall Apart - Chinua Achebe
They are eating like hungry little hippos. They love Cheerios but will eat green beans, squash, sweet potatoes, but hate pees. They also enjoy yogurt and all fruits. There only words are “mama”.
But 50%. That's good in baseball.
There was a hint of consumer fairness in the air back in 2009. Elizabeth Razzi at voices.washingtonpost.com said:
I grew up living a pretty healthy lifestyle-at least I think so. Until last year when I had shoulder surgery, I wouldn’t let myself go a day without doing some sort of exercise in fear that I might gain some weight that day. It’s embarrassing how obsessed I was with getting chubby.
Andrea Hernandez spoke in the following session with contagious energy about one strategic upgrade at the Martin J Gottleib Jewish Day School: student blogfolios. A term Andrea has created, a blogfolio is a blog + a portfolio. Beginning last year in kindergarten, third and fifth grade; and this year extending to the entire school third through eighth grade, blogfoloios are offering students at the Martin J Gottlieb Jewish Day School a voice with an authentic audience. Started as digital portfolios on a wordpress blog to use primarily for assessment of learning, students were so excited to receive their own blog that they wanted to write. The magic began! Students became bloggers, in Andrea’s words, “learning to create and creating to learn.”
I'm pushing 46 with a very short stick, so suffice it to say that I'm finding myself in the midst of the hormonal insanity that is perimenopause.
I have my fingers crossed, as well as my pedal phalanges, my eyes, and everything else that it’s possible to cross. The main reason is, of course, to piss off that Alien and send it away to an alternate universe. I’m tired. And I’m tired of being tired! It’s tiring being tired. But enough of that. I’m tired. Good night all! (It is still night somewhere….)
Joe Varley
But Newscorp’s great white hope is ’The Daily’ – a tablet format taken up by Apple, and the subject of some pretty confident grins from Newscorp’s owner earlier this year. However, rather like his role-model the USSR, when a news blackout on data is declared, then you know Soyuz Murdoch may not be coming back. Until very recently, tales of the Daily having made a firm start followed by a dull thud were purely anecdotal. But now – with major help from the Canadian social media firm PostRank – media writer Joshua Barton has been analysing Twitter activity at The Daily since its launch. This suggests — at least when viewed through the lens of Twitter sharing — that The Daily is losing audience over time. In eight weeks there were just 6,026 tweets….and falling. As in, falling off a cliff. Decline and churn show the same pattern as the Times newspaper: a vertical drop once trialists start being charged for the service.
Some Veterans Groups, tired of long waits to receive mental healthcare through the VA Hospitals for PTSD and more filed a lawsuit in Federal Court against the VA, winning a 2 to 1 ruling against the VA, that cited, “Department of Veterans Affairs documents showed that the system took an average of 4.4 years to review veterans’ health care claims, that more than 1,400 veterans who had been denied coverage died in one six-month period while their appeals were pending, and that 18 veterans per day were committing suicide, much higher than the rate among the general population”
We met in town for dinner before running an errand and he reminded me that it was Thursday night. As in the kind of Thursday night where we have a date in our bedroom at the end of the day. The kind of date that almost always ends in tears. For the first time that I can remember I actually welcomed the spanking. It's hard to admit this out loud but knowing it was coming calmed me down.
past the bay window façades
Anyone else think that I may die?
When Jaxon looked in the mirror he didn’t see what everyone else saw. Jaxon considered himself plain and overgrown. Although the women on Loathsome Creek thought of J.P. as a good-looking man, a studded catch, he thought of himself as a much less than a pillar of the community. Jaxon’s self-image wasn’t as favorable. By the time he was twenty-one, he felt like an old spirit in a young man’s body. He just wasn’t comfortable in his own skin. He saw himself as someone with a dark side, which had confiscated his inner being. His love for the almighty dollar sometimes took over his love for anything else, including his family. Jaxon fought the feelings to withdraw from the world, and no one understood what was going on inside J.P.’s head. It was almost as if his soul was possessed. However, his heart was lost in his love of money. He was determined to become the richest man on Loathsome Creek, and it didn’t really matter how he got the title.
"No!" came his indignant answer.
This species is in the family Acastidae within the Order Phacopida (factsheet). I have written about a member of this order before as I have a good-quality fossil of Phacops sp., including some fine details such as eye structure, but nothing quite as impressively odd-looking as this. The genus is unusual in showing a departure from strict bilateral symmetry, particularly in W. hammii with its sideways-curled occipital spine. However, the most eye-catching feature is of course the trident. Its function is uncertain due to a lack of data (Chatterton et al., 2006), although the presence of horns strongly suggests sexual dimorphism rather than having a primarily sensory, protective or hydrodynamic function (Knell & Fortey, 2005), though one or more of these could have occurred secondarily. Instead it appears most likely that it was used in competition between males (much like the horns and antlers of certain modern-day male beetles) and/or as a feature involved in mate selection by females ("ooo, what a big getting-in-the-way-when-feeding trident you have"). More data may eventually tell, but I can certainly imagine the trident being used to flip rival males. A close relative in the same family is Comura bultyncki which is well armed with spines, including some which curve off-centre, but no trident.
Levesque’s ask has become reality. According to author Steven Brill, ex–DC school chancellor Michelle Rhee’s new group, StudentsFirst, raised $100 million within a few months of Levesque’s remarks. Rhee’s donors include Rupert Murdoch, philanthropist Eli Broad and Home Depot founder Ken Langone. Rhee’s group has pledged to spend more than $1 billion to bring for-profit schools, including virtual education, to the entire country by electing reform-friendly candidates and hiring top-notch state lobbyists.
I spent Monday in the art museum before getting on my return train, but when I got out it snowed again, and hard. I thought I knew where the train station was, but the snow was coming down so hard I got lost. I remember walking up a bridge thinking I was going the right way, but after awhile it was clear I wasn't. In desperation, I asked a passerby where the train station was, and of course, it turned out I was going in the opposite direction, which is what I had suspected. My train was delayed, and I knew I'd miss a day of work.
Name Your Link">Raiders offered great worldly locations right from the beginning where Indy finds a treasure cave perfectly booby trapped for which only Indiana knows the way through the traps that are set. Frozen land of Nepal to the desert of Cairo to a remote island that will witness the power of the ark for all there to see.
Though not always easy, since she once in a while recalls
Collisions and Castaways debuted at #3 on the Billboard Heatseekers chart upon its release. It is the 5th cd from the Alaskan metallers.
Smith’s catalogue is funny, touching and thoughtful. While he does not boast to have the talent of a skilful filmmaker, what he has to say always comes through and everything else is secondary.
All protests began at the same time, 12:30 am at various villages and parts of the capital, DPA reported.
-Miz back to the top but Santino with the punch to the gut.
On Christmas Eve, the trains are on display in the bank's lobby. When bank robbers appear, the mysterious night watchman urges Oscar to flee by "jumping." He does so, first into the train set and then ten years into the future...
If a Christian said he believed something different.. like the Arians (no, not like Hitler, just a phonetic coincidence) or Manicheans or Cathars, then they'd be heretics and fair game for a good smacking around.
But at the end of all this, as long as the audience is appreciating the show and paying attention as opposed to texting on their phones all night, I don't care if they are making noise or not. It's more fun if they are excited and it certainly helps build the overall energy of the event and my energy as well, but it's showbiz and you can't control everything. I do think it is worth noting that sometimes the most uptight crowd is the most inappropriate after a few (and then plus) drinks. They have propositioned performers for "private shows", asked for our phone numbers as if we were escorts fronting as burlesque performers, try to dance on the stage WITH us DURING our acts, and the list goes on. When they shit, they don't care where!
I chose the second option and like Frost's path less traveled, that made all the difference. Yes, it was a lot of work, but it was worth it.
Associate Professor
Well, after chatting with S. on Facebook for a while, I decided to check out who else she had on her friend list... and I found Daniel. I had a secret crush on Daniel during our last year of school. He was the wild child, the guy who wasn't going to be tamed by anyone. He wore torn jeans and t-shirts with ugly skulls. He wore leather bands around his neck and arms. He was the bad boy of the class... he was the guy that all teachers agreed to be a hopeless case. So they gave up on him.
Gentleness or meekness is the opposite to self-assertiveness and self-interest. It stems from trust in God’s goodness and control over the situation. The gentle person is not occupied with self at all. This is a work of the Holy Spirit, not of the human will.
Fits UK4-6
Ah! Also, when I have time, I’ml learning Chinese bit by bit!!
One senses that, should Mr Coulson one day require the services of a biographer, he need look no further than British historian David Irving. He’s out on bail now and, I’ve no doubt, is short of commissions. For if Andy Coulson knew nothing about any of the heinous activities outlined above, it is a reasonable contention that Hitler know nothing of the Holocaust. Hitler may even have been a Mossad agent before Mossad was formed. Because in Andy Coulson’s universe, anything – no matter how incredible – must be accepted as very probably the truth.
Presented in Living Monophonic Sound.
David delivered an interesting speech which explored the possible consequences of the people of Scotland voting for independence from the UK in the referendum which is planned to be held north of the border in autumn 2014. A yes vote would have all manner of interesting effects on the rest of the UK, both domestically and internationally, the meeting was told. See here for an interesting article by David on this theme.
The couple now falls into grief, and Chapter One of the film (Grief) begins. “He” is a therapist (or as a feminist sociology teacher of mine was fond of saying, “the-rapist”), and makes the poor decision to act in this capacity for his wife. “She” is a graduate student who has been working on, but has not finished, her thesis project dealing with the history of witchcraft and the persecution of women. In order to confront her grief, He compiles a list of things of which She is fearful. Near the top of this list is Eden, the name they have given to their cabin in the woods where She has done much of her writing. They decide to go back to Eden so that She can confront and overcome her most primal fear.
2 tsp garlic, minced
So the Dead Sea. Super awesome. Except it BURNS your eyes and well, other things too. Scratches you didn’t even know you had. And if you ever go, whatever you do, DO NOT get a drop of it in your mouth.
I still love the idea of documenting loved and beautiful things. I love the ideas of collections. I love the idea of coordinating a color theme with them, to give some unification of the disparate items.
I shook my head.
Next time we will start to wrap this thing up.
We finally headed home thinking we had all sorts of good stuff for lunch, only to discover that lunch was well under way in the outdoor kitchen. (this house has 3: the regular kitchen by the dining room, the basement kitchen for when it's too hot and there's canning to do, and the outdoor kitchen because it's just nicer to cook outside in fine weather)
Check out my reviews for
In short, neither side has changed many minds.
I did not know him,
"Grandma and Mom, God is in my head."
This is the site that a girl will have saved in her FAVOURITES on her notebook or iPad on the go throughout the day as a reference site because it is also a fun site in which you can play around through the various search styles.
_____I'm going to do this weird, modern thing called "Posting original material." I promise I don't work at the re-post office anymore.
LG Company has set a good pace in electronic industry by releasing cutting-edge technologies amidst stiff competition from traditional competitors such as Sony. The technology savvy team at LG have converted the Blu-ray disk player from just playing blue ray movies to being able to hook up to the Netfix and YouTube streaming video. Essentially, you can now watch and play videos from your Blu-Ray BD390.
Kellie is our resident love expert. Is your life in shambles? Any troubles in your life that you may need advice on? Submit your letters to Kellie and she may just solve all your life problems.
Police believe Nally began killing the animals in January.
Flora Finching (Little Dorrit)
The FBI discovered one VIN number on the Pathfinder that the perpetrator forgot to scratch off, and traced it to a woman in Connecticut.
Mr. Selznick has produced wonderful work in the past. This time he's done something that is very good. If only he hadn't spoiled us with The Invention of Hugo Cabret.
11 oz can mandarin orange with juice
We hung out, the youngers all played on the trampoline till the sun went down. Then it was back inside for cartoons and WII games. We've been doing this every Saturday for months and it hasn't gotten old yet.
Among Americans with tattoos, 34% said having a tattoo has made them feel sexier. Interestingly, more tattooed females (42%) feel this way than males (25%). Over one-third (36%) of those with a tattoo, however, say having it makes them feel more rebellious, up from 29 percent who felt this way in 2003, and three in ten (31%) say the tattoo makes then feel sexy, while others said a tattoo makes them feel more attractive (26%). One in five (19%) each say having the tattoo makes them feel attractive and strong.
Empty.
As long as there is love in each of those moments then it hopefully makes it even the tinniest bit brighter.
“And Peter answered and said, Thou art the Christ, the Son of the living God.”
But we've informed them of it, and given them the camera footage to show the problem, so if there's another deluge, and businesses on our site get flooded, then the claims will be against the city, not us. We can prove our drains are clear and properly maintained.
- Google Plus-ing one of our posts (100 points)
1/2 cup walnuts, chopped
Fear kills spiritual and natural gifts. It wrecks long-view plans. It makes us imagine non-existent enemies and causes paranoia. Fear stuffs useful people with useful ideas into small confining boxes where their usefulness is wasted. God hasn’t called Christians to box living. This fact is evident from the New Testament which is brimful of stories of ordinary people who got out of their small boxes and did extraordinary work for God.
But I can spread dreamy almond butter on aannnnyyyyything (which also can be a bit unfortunate).
I countered with a story about my prep school, wherein they took attendance at classes, lunch, after-school sports and evening study hall. And when I quit the system, I stopped going to everything where they took attendance, including lunch.
I know, there are a lot of photos but I just couldn't make a selection... I hope you don't mind.
I confess. Football season is a love/hate thing for me. I simply do not understand why it begins earlier and earlier every year. Pre-Season. Season. Post Season. College. NFL. Super Bowl. Weeknights. Weekends. Afternoon. Evening.
This is the cloud that hangs over the next 300-odd pages, as Esma offers up fragments of family history, beginning with her mother’s birth in a village near the Euphrates. She describes a world where women as well as men enforce an honour code that results in the social death of men who fail to act like men, and the actual death of several female relatives. When her family migrates to Istanbul, and then to London in the early 1970s, they take that code with them, but as they grow accustomed to life in the west it becomes less a system of social regulation than a compulsion they can neither control nor understand.
To help people at all times,
Aside from fascinating, unconventional items like Ed Wood and Big Fish, he has been applying the “Tim Burton touch” to remakes and adaptations of very familiar works for two decades now. Let’s hope that his Dark Shadows brings back the sense of innovation and imagination he displayed in his early features. Although, with the kooky, crazy makeup, I’m sorta having my doubts. (I’d be happy to be proven wrong….)
I hope to sell a few which I am selling for little money, what doesn't sell at the show will go onto my etsy store. I am just having fun painting.
I never knew they existed until yesterday when I bought them at our local Food Lover’s Market. They are seriously juicy and much less “dense” than their “average” local cousins. They taste like an apple/pear hybrid. And I mean you can actually taste BOTH types of fruit. Unlike the grapple which just smells like grape but ends up tasting like an apple dipped in grape juice.
“Tal, it’s only a thunderstorm,” Andy stressed, pulling her back down onto the couch. “Don’t get up! I’ll miss you.”
Here's what I chose:
We praise Him first in accordance with the fact that He is the Origin and Beginning of every creature, both physical and spiritual.
It may be cynical of me to look at the following examples, but hey. I’m cynical. Sony stop selling PS3′s with backwards compatibility but then start selling their old games on the PSN along with ‘creating’ HD remakes of their classic PS2 titles. PS Vita has a convinient ‘passport’ system for their games. The Wii has a virtual console that sells us games we own. Where companies truly takes advantage of the fans need to ‘own everything’ is by selling us stuff that we couldn’t access before. ‘Import’ games sold via digital means are becoming evermore popular. Why? Because we demand access to everything. Even shitty, obscure games that weren’t worth releasing worldwide.
Lovely concentration with real texture in the mouth and long finish – honey and nuts & delicate dried and fresh apricot. A well balanced example – 90/100 points.
“He’s a squire,” Alexandre corrected. “And as such he’s doing a man’s work and is therefore considered a man.”
and this song in particular.
Which sounds remarkably like what we are telling kids today. Kids who, just a generation ago, were perfectly capable of making their way in the outside world — babysitting, playing in the park, walking to school — are now being told: What on earth are you doing out here? The world is too dangerous for you, you sweet, silly creatures! We’re only saying this for your own good. Go home! (Or, alternatively, “Go to soccer practice, which we will drive you to and pick you up from.”)
I've been a sporadic blogger lately- and for that I am so so sorry! BUT, I assure you it's not because I'm twiddling my thumbs over here! It's been a busy Christmas break and I almost can't wait until school starts so I can resume regular blogging (jk...kinda).
2- Then click on Edit HTML
List 7 things about myself that my readers would find interesting……
This morning, I took the bus down. Didn’t have to worry about looking for parking. Got my credentials in the authors lounge and the Student Union and was able to sit down with Dr. Kevin Leman, the author of the birth order book. Interesting man, it was a pleasure to just listen to him.
Learning so much about myself already... and I haven't even arrived at the retreat yet.
Toward the end of the documentary the filmmakers (very tentatively) ask the octogenarian photographer about his personal life. None of the "talking head" contributors presented as Cunningham's friends know anything about how he lives or where, his background, his personal life, etc. (At the time the film was made, Cunningham was living in one of the fabled rent-controlled studios atop Carnegie Hall, home to many artists over the decades, and were about to get evicted (though relocated locally). Cunningham's studio had no kitchen, the bathroom was down the hall, but he was fine with it -- in fact, it's a point of pride.)
Hello my Darlin Dears, Feathered & Fellow meadow creatures of the trees & you lovable Gnomes who are doing a great job at collecting me vintage fabric to send to my lovely friend Nora & to quilt with,
